Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1478.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 4-101, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-101. Definitions In this title, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Act of violence": (a) Means an incident that consists of a riot, a fight, an altercation or tumultuous conduct and that meets at least one of the following criteria: (i) Bodily injuries are sustained by any person and the injuries would be obvious to a reasonable person. (ii) Is of sufficient intensity as to require the intervention of a peace officer to restore normal order. (iii) A weapon is brandished, displayed or used. (iv) A licensee or an employee or contractor of the licensee fails to follow a clear and direct lawful order from a law enforcement officer or a fire marshal. (b) Does not include the use of nonlethal devices by a peace officer. 2. "Aggrieved party" means a person who resides at, owns or leases property within a one-mile radius of premises proposed to be licensed and who filed a written request with the department to speak in favor of or opposition to the issuance of the license not later than sixty days after filing the application or fifteen days after action by the local governing body, whichever is sooner. 3. "Beer": (a) Means any beverage obtained by the alcoholic fermentation, infusion or decoction of barley malt, hops, rice, bran or other grain, glucose, sugar or molasses, or any combination of them, and may include, as adjuncts in fermentation, honey, fruit, fruit juice, fruit concentrate, herbs, spices and other food materials. (b) Includes beer aged in an empty wooden barrel previously used to contain wine or distilled spirits and as such is not considered a dilution or mixture of any other spirituous liquor. 4. "Biometric identity verification device" means a device authorized by the department that instantly verifies the identity and age of a person by an electronic scan of a biometric of the person, through a fingerprint, iris image, facial image or other biometric characteristic, or any combination of these characteristics, that references the person's identity and age against any record described in section 4-241, subsection K, and that meets all of the following conditions: (a) The authenticity of the record was previously verified by an electronic authentication process. (b) The identity of and information about the record holder was previously verified through either: (i) A secondary, electronic authentication process or set of processes using commercially available data, such as a public records query or a knowledge-based authentication quiz. (ii) Using a state or federal government system of records for digital authentication. (c) The authenticated record was securely linked to biometrics contemporaneously collected from the verified record holder and is stored in a centralized, highly secured, encrypted biometric database. 5. "Board" means the state liquor board. 6. "Bona fide guest" means: (a) An individual who is personally familiar to the member, who is personally sponsored by the member and whose presence as a guest is in response to a specific and personal invitation. (b) In the case of a club that meets the criteria prescribed in paragraph 8  9, subdivision (a) of this section, a current member of the armed services of the United States who presents proper military identification and any member of a recognized veterans' organization of the United States and of any country allied with the United States during current or past wars or through treaty arrangements. 7. "Broken package" means any container of spirituous liquor on which the United States tax seal has been broken or removed or from which the cap, cork or seal placed on the container by the manufacturer producer has been removed. 8. "Cider": (a) means any beverage that is made from the normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound and ripe apples, pears or other pome fruit and that contains more than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and not more than eight and one-half percent of alcohol by volume. (b) INcludes flavored, sparkling and carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple, pear or other pome fruit must. 8. 9. "Club" includes any of the following organizations where the sale of spirituous liquor for consumption on the premises is made only to members, spouses of members, families of members, bona fide guests of members and guests at other events authorized in this title: (a) A post, chapter, camp or other local unit composed solely of veterans and its duly recognized auxiliary that has been chartered by the Congress of the United States for patriotic, fraternal or benevolent purposes and that has, as the owner, lessee or occupant, operated an establishment for that purpose in this state. (b) A chapter, aerie, parlor, lodge or other local unit of an American national fraternal organization that has, as the owner, lessee or occupant, operated an establishment for fraternal purposes in this state. An American national fraternal organization as used in this subdivision shall actively operate in at least thirty-six states or have been in active continuous existence for at least twenty years. (c) A hall or building association of a local unit mentioned in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this paragraph of which all of the capital stock is owned by the local unit or the members and that operates the clubroom facilities of the local unit. (d) A golf club that has more than fifty bona fide members and that owns, maintains or operates a bona fide golf links together with a clubhouse. (e) A social club that has more than one hundred bona fide members who are actual residents of the county in which it is located, that owns, maintains or operates club quarters, that is authorized and incorporated to operate as a nonprofit club under the laws of this state, and that has been continuously incorporated and operating for a period of at least one year. The club shall have had, during this one-year period, a bona fide membership with regular meetings conducted at least once each month, and the membership shall be and shall have been actively engaged in carrying out the objects of the club. The club's membership shall consist of bona fide dues-paying members paying dues of at least $6 per year, payable monthly, quarterly or annually, which have been recorded by the secretary of the club, and the members at the time of application for a club license shall be in good standing having for at least one full year paid dues. At least fifty-one percent of the members shall have signified their intention to secure a social club license by personally signing a petition, on a form prescribed by the board, which shall also include the correct mailing address of each signer. The petition shall not have been signed by a member at a date earlier than one hundred eighty days before the filing of the application. The club shall qualify for exemption from the payment of state income taxes under title 43. It is the intent of this subdivision that a license shall not be granted to a club that is, or has been, primarily formed or activated to obtain a license to sell liquor, but solely to a bona fide club, where the sale of liquor is incidental to the main purposes of the club. (f) An airline club operated by or for airlines that are certificated by the United States government and that maintain or operate club quarters located at airports with international status. 9. 10. "Company" or "association", when used in reference to a corporation, includes successors or assigns. 10. 11. "Control" means the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of an applicant or licensee, whether through the ownership of voting securities or a partnership interest, by agreement or otherwise. Control is presumed to exist if a person has the direct or indirect ownership of or power to vote ten percent or more of the outstanding voting securities of the applicant or licensee or to control in any manner the election of one or more of the directors of the applicant or licensee. In the case of a partnership, control is presumed to mean the general partner or a limited partner who holds ten percent or more of the voting rights of the partnership. For the purposes of determining the percentage of voting securities owned, controlled or held by a person, there shall be aggregated with the voting securities attributed to the person the voting securities of an officer, partner, employee or agent of the person or a spouse, parent or child of the person. Control is also presumed to exist if a creditor of the applicant or licensee holds a beneficial interest in ten percent or more of the liabilities of the licensee. The presumptions in this paragraph regarding control are rebuttable. 11. 12. "Controlling person" means a person directly or indirectly possessing control of an applicant or licensee. 12. 13. "Craft distiller" means a distiller in the United States or in a territory or possession of the United States that holds a license pursuant to section 4-205.10. 13. 14. "Craft producer" means a licensed farm winery, a licensed microbrewery or a licensed craft distiller. 14. 15. "Department" means the department of liquor licenses and control. 15. 16. "Director" means the director of the department of liquor licenses and control. 16. 17. "Distilled spirits" includes alcohol, brandy, whiskey, rum, tequila, mescal, gin, absinthe, a compound or mixture of any of them or of any of them with any vegetable or other substance, alcohol bitters, bitters containing alcohol, fruits preserved in ardent spirits, beverages that contain more than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and that are produced by the distillation or rectification of FERMENTED MATERIAL and any alcoholic mixture or preparation, whether patented or otherwise, that may in sufficient quantities produce intoxication. 17. 18. "Employee": (a) Means any person who performs any service on licensed premises on a full-time, part-time or contract basis with consent of the licensee, whether or not the person is denominated an employee or independent contractor or otherwise. Employee (b) Does not include a person who is exclusively on the premises for musical or vocal performances, for repair or maintenance of the premises or for the delivery of goods to the licensee. 18. 19. "Farm winery" means a winery in the United States or in a territory or possession of the United States that holds a license pursuant to section 4-205.04. 19. 20. "Government license" means a license to serve and sell spirituous liquor on specified premises available only to a state agency, state board, state commission, county, city, town, community college or state university or the national guard or Arizona coliseum and exposition center on application by the governing body of the state agency, state board, state commission, county, city, town, community college or state university or the national guard or Arizona exposition and state fair board. 20. 21. "Legal drinking age" means twenty-one years of age or older. 21. 22. "License" means a license or an interim retail permit issued pursuant to this title. 22. 23. "Licensee" means a person who has been issued a license or an interim retail permit pursuant to this title or a special event licensee. 23. 24. "License fees" means fees collected for license issuance, license application, license renewal, interim permit issuance and license transfer between persons or locations. 24. 25. "Manager" means a natural person who meets the standards required of licensees and who has authority to organize, direct, carry on, control or otherwise operate a licensed business on a temporary or full-time basis. 25. 26. "Menu food item" means a food item from a regular menu, special menu or happy hour menu that is prepared by the licensee or the licensee's employee. 26. 27. "Microbrewery" means a brewery in the United States or in a territory or possession of the United States that meets the requirements of section 4-205.08. 27. 28. "Mixed cocktail": (a) Means any drink combined at the premises of an authorized licensee that contains a spirituous liquor and that is combined with at least one other ingredient, which may include additional spirituous liquors, fruit juice, vegetable juice, mixers, cream, flavored syrup or other ingredients except water, and that when combined contains more than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume. (b) Does not include a drink sold in an original manufacturer's packaging or any drink poured from an original manufacturer's package without the addition of all of the cocktail's other ingredients at the premises of the licensed bar, liquor store or restaurant. 28. 29. "Off-sale retailer" means any person that operates a bona fide regularly established retail liquor store that sells spirituous liquors, wines and beer and any established retail store that sells commodities other than spirituous liquors and that is engaged in the sale of spirituous liquors only in the original unbroken package, to be taken away from the premises of the retailer and to be consumed off the premises. 29. 30. "On-sale retailer" means any person operating an establishment where spirituous liquors are sold in the original container for consumption on or off the premises or in individual portions for consumption on the premises. 30. 31. "Permanent occupancy" means the maximum occupancy of the building or facility as set by the office of the state fire marshal for the jurisdiction in which the building or facility is located. 31. 32. "Person" includes a partnership, limited liability company, association, company or corporation, as well as a natural person. 32. 33. "Premises" or "licensed premises": (a) Means the area from which the licensee is authorized to sell, dispense or serve spirituous liquors under the provision of the license. (b) Includes a patio that is not contiguous to the remainder of the premises or licensed premises if the patio is separated from the remainder of the premises or licensed premises by a public or private walkway or driveway not to exceed thirty feet, subject to rules the director may adopt to establish criteria for noncontiguous premises. 33. 34. "Registered alcohol delivery contractor": (a) Means a person who delivers spirituous liquor to a consumer on behalf of a bar, beer and wine bar, liquor store, beer and wine store or restaurant. (b) Does not include: (i) A motor carrier as defined in section 28-5201. (ii) An independent contractor, a subcontractor of an independent contractor, an employee of an independent contractor or an employee of a subcontractor as provided in section 4-203, subsection J. 34. 35. "Registered mail" includes certified mail. 35. 36. "Registered retail agent" means any person who is authorized pursuant to section 4-222 to purchase spirituous liquors for and on behalf of the person and other retail licensees. 36. 37. "Repeated acts of violence" means: (a) For licensed premises with a permanent occupancy of two hundred or fewer persons, two or more acts of violence occurring within seven days or three or more acts of violence occurring within thirty days. (b) For licensed premises with a permanent occupancy of more than two hundred but not more than four hundred persons, four or more acts of violence within thirty days. (c) For licensed premises with a permanent occupancy of more than four hundred but not more than six hundred fifty persons, five or more acts of violence within thirty days. (d) For licensed premises with a permanent occupancy of more than six hundred fifty but not more than one thousand fifty persons, six or more acts of violence within thirty days. (e) For licensed premises with a permanent occupancy of more than one thousand fifty persons, seven or more acts of violence within thirty days. 37. 38. "Sell" includes soliciting or receiving an order for, keeping or exposing for sale, directly or indirectly delivering for value, peddling, keeping with intent to sell and trafficking in. 38. 39. "Spirituous liquor": (a) Includes alcohol, brandy, whiskey, rum, tequila, mescal, gin, wine, porter, ale, beer, cider, any malt liquor or malt beverage, absinthe, a compound or mixture of any of them or of any of them with any vegetable or other substance, alcohol bitters, bitters containing alcohol, any liquid mixture or preparation, whether patented or otherwise, that produces intoxication, fruits preserved in ardent spirits, and beverages containing more than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume. (b) Does not include nonbeverage products as defined in 27 code of federal regulations part 17 and that are qualified by the United States alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau as nonbeverage products. 39. 40. "Tamperproof sealed" means designed to prevent consumption without the removal of a tamperproof cap, seal, cork or closure that has a device, mechanism or adhesive that clearly shows whether a container has been opened. 40. 41. "Vehicle" means any means of transportation by land, water or air, and includes everything made use of in any way for such transportation. 41. 42. "Vending machine" means a machine that dispenses merchandise through the means of coin, token, credit card or other nonpersonal means of accepting payment for merchandise received. 42. 43. "Veteran" means a person who has served in the United States air force, army, navy, marine corps, space force or coast guard, as an active nurse in the services of the American red cross, in the army and navy nurse corps in time of war, or in any expedition of the armed forces of the United States, and who has received a discharge other than dishonorable. 43. 44. "Voting security" means any security presently entitling the owner or holder of the security to vote for the election of directors of an applicant or a licensee. 44. 45. "Wine" means the product obtained by the fermentation of grapes, other agricultural products containing natural or added sugar or cider or any such alcoholic beverage fortified with grape brandy and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 4-201, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-201. Licensing; application procedure in city, town or county; burden of proof A. A person desiring a license to manufacture PRODUCE, sell or deal in spirituous liquors shall apply to the director on a form prescribed and furnished by the director. B. A person who files an application for a license within an incorporated city or town shall file the application with the director. The director shall remit the application to the city or town clerk. The city or town clerk shall immediately file a copy of the application in the clerk's office and post a copy for a period of twenty days in a conspicuous place on the front of the premises where the business is proposed to be conducted, with a statement requiring any natural person who is a bona fide resident residing or owning or leasing property within a one-mile radius from the premises proposed to be licensed, and who is in favor of or opposed to the issuance of the license, to file written arguments in favor of or opposed to the issuance of the license with the clerk within twenty days after the date of posting. The posting shall be limited to a copy of the license application and shall not contain any attachments filed with the application. The written argument shall contain the natural person's complete name, street address or post office box address and written or electronic signature. If the written arguments are filed by a person on behalf of a corporation or other legal entity or association, the written arguments must be accompanied by a copy of the entity's organizing document, a designation of the office or position that the person holds within the organization and a copy of the written appointment of the person to speak on behalf of the organization. If the written arguments are filed by a neighborhood association, block watch or other unincorporated association, written arguments must be accompanied by a letter of authority designating that person as a spokesperson. The posting shall contain substantially the following: Notice A hearing on a liquor license application shall be held before the local governing body at the following date, time and place: (Insert date, time and address) The local governing body will recommend to the state liquor board whether the board should grant or deny the license. The state liquor board may hold a hearing to consider the recommendation of the local governing body. Any person residing or owning or leasing property within a one-mile radius may contact the state liquor board in writing to register as a protestor. To request information regarding procedures before the board and notice of any board hearings regarding this application, contact the state liquor board at: (Insert address and telephone number). No arguments shall be filed or accepted by the city or town clerk thereafter. This subsection does not prevent a bona fide resident residing or owning or leasing property within a one-mile radius from the premises proposed to be licensed from testifying in favor of or in opposition to the issuance of the license, regardless of whether or not the person is a user or nonuser of spirituous liquor. C. The governing body of the city, town or county shall then enter an order recommending approval or disapproval within sixty days after the filing of the application and shall file a certified copy of the order with the director. If the recommendation is for disapproval, a statement of the specific reasons containing a summary of the testimony or other evidence supporting the recommendation for disapproval shall be attached to the order. All petitions submitted to the governing body within the twenty-day period for filing protests shall be transmitted to the director with the certified copy of the order. D. If a person applies for a license to conduct a spirituous liquor business outside an incorporated city or town, the director shall remit the application to the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county where the applicant desires to do business, and the proceedings by the clerk and board of supervisors shall be as provided for cities and towns. E. On receipt of an application for a spirituous liquor license, the director shall set the application for a hearing by the board on a date following the expiration of the time fixed for the submitting of the certified order by the governing body of the city or town or the board of supervisors. If the city or town or the county recommends approval of the license a hearing is not required unless the director, the board or any aggrieved party requests a hearing on the grounds that the public convenience and the best interest of the community will not be substantially served if a license is issued. Any natural person residing or owning or leasing property within a one-mile radius of the proposed location may file a written protest with the director on a form prescribed by the director not later than fifteen calendar days after action by the local governing body or sixty days after the filing of the application, whichever is sooner. The director shall allow protests to be submitted by e-mail email. The written argument shall contain the natural person's complete name, street address or post office box address and written or electronic signature. If the written arguments are filed by a person on behalf of a corporation or other legal entity or association, the written arguments must be accompanied by a copy of the entity's organizing document, a designation of the office or position that the person holds within the organization and a copy of the written appointment of the person to speak on behalf of the organization. If the written arguments are filed by a neighborhood association, block watch or other unincorporated association, written arguments must be accompanied by a letter of authority designating that person as a spokesperson. If no hearing is requested by the director, the board or any aggrieved party, the application may be approved by the director. If the recommendation is for disapproval of an application, the board shall hold a hearing. If the city, town or county recommends approval of the license pursuant to subsection C of this section or makes no recommendation, the director may cancel the hearing and issue the license unless the board or any aggrieved party requests a hearing. If the reason for the protest is clearly removed or deemed satisfied by the director, the board shall cancel the hearing. If the board cancels the hearing, the department may administratively issue an order without the applicant licensee or other parties present. The certified order, the reasons contained in the order and the summary of the testimony and other evidence supporting the city, town or county disapproval of the recommendation shall be read into the record before the board and shall be considered as evidence by the board. The board shall consider the certified order together with other facts and a report of the director relating to the qualifications of the applicant. If the governing body of the city or town or the board of supervisors fails to return to the director, as provided in subsections subsection C and D of this section, its order of disapproval, no hearing is required. An application shall be approved or disapproved within one hundred five days after the filing of the application. If, after a hearing by the board where a license has been approved, a formal written order is not entered within thirty days after the hearing, the decision of the board is deemed entered on the thirtieth day after the hearing. F. A hearing may be conducted by an administrative law judge at the request of the board to make findings and recommendations for use by the board in determining whether to grant or deny a license. The administrative law judge shall submit a report of findings to the board within twenty days after the hearing. The board may affirm, reverse, adopt, modify, supplement, amend or reject the administrative law judge's report in whole or in part. G. Except for a person-to-person transfer of a transferable license for use at the same location and as otherwise provided in section 4-203, subsection A, in all proceedings before the governing body of a city or town, the board of supervisors of a county or the board, the applicant bears the burden of showing that the public convenience requires and that the best interest of the community will be substantially served by the issuance of a license. H. In order to prevent the proliferation of spirituous liquor licenses, the department may deny a license to a business on the grounds that the business is inappropriate for the sale of spirituous liquor. An inappropriate business is one that cannot clearly demonstrate that the sale of spirituous liquor is directly connected to its primary purpose and that the sale of spirituous liquor is not merely incidental to its primary purpose. I. The board shall adopt, by rule, guidelines that state criteria for use in determining whether the public convenience requires and the best interest of the community will be substantially served by the issuance or transfer of a liquor license at the location applied for. These guidelines shall govern the recommendations and other approvals of the department and the local governing authority. J. If the governing body of a city or town recommends disapproval by a two-thirds vote of the members present and voting on an application for the issuance or transfer of a spirituous liquor license that, if approved, would result in a license being issued at a location either having no license or having a license of a different series, the application shall not be approved unless the board decides to approve the application by a two-thirds vote of the members present and voting. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 4-203, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-203. Licenses; issuance; transfer; reversion to state; tastings; rules; off-sale privileges; order requirements A. A spirituous liquor license shall be issued only after satisfactory showing of the capability, qualifications and reliability of the applicant and, with the exception of wholesaler, producer, government or club licenses, that the public convenience requires and that the best interest of the community will be substantially served by the issuance. If an application is filed for the issuance of a transferable or nontransferable license, other than for a craft distiller license, a microbrewery license or a farm winery license, for a location that on the date the application is filed has a valid license of the same series, or in the case of a restaurant license application filed for a location with a valid hotel-motel license, issued at that location, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the public convenience and best interest of the community at that location was established at the time the location was previously licensed. The presumption may be rebutted by competent contrary evidence. The presumption shall not apply once the licensed location has not been in use for more than one hundred eighty days and the presumption shall not extend to the personal qualifications of the applicant. B. The license shall be to manufacture PRODUCE, sell or deal in spirituous liquors only at the place and in the manner provided in the license. A separate license shall be issued for each specific business, and each shall specify: 1. The particular spirituous liquors that the licensee is authorized to manufacture PRODUCE, sell or deal in. 2. The place of business for which issued. 3. The purpose for which the liquors may be manufactured PRODUCED or sold. C. A spirituous liquor license issued to a bar, a liquor store or a beer and wine bar shall be transferable as to any permitted location within the same county, if the transfer meets the requirements of an original application. A spirituous liquor license may be transferred to a person qualified to be a licensee, if the transfer is pursuant to either judicial decree, nonjudicial foreclosure of a legal or equitable lien, including security interests held by financial institutions pursuant to section 4-205.05, a sale of the license, a bona fide sale of the entire business and stock in trade, or other bona fide transactions that are provided for by rule. Any change in ownership of the business of a licensee, directly or indirectly, as defined by rule is deemed a transfer, except that there is no transfer if a new artificial person is added to the ownership of a licensee's business but the controlling persons remain identical to the controlling persons that have been previously disclosed to the director as part of the licensee's existing ownership. D. All applications for a new license pursuant to section 4-201 or for a transfer to a new location pursuant to subsection C of this section shall be filed with and determined by the director, except when the governing body of the city or town or the board of supervisors receiving an application pursuant to section 4-201 orders disapproval of the application or when the director, the state liquor board or any aggrieved party requests a hearing. The application shall then be presented to the state liquor board, and the new license or transfer shall not become effective unless approved by the state liquor board. E. A person who assigns, surrenders, transfers or sells control of a liquor license or business that has a spirituous liquor license shall notify the director within thirty business days after the assignment, surrender, transfer or sale. A spirituous liquor license shall not be leased or subleased. A concession agreement entered into under section 4-205.03 is not considered a lease or sublease in violation of this section. F. If a person other than those persons originally licensed acquires control over a license or licensee, the person shall file notice of the acquisition with the director within thirty business days after the acquisition of control and a list of officers, directors or other controlling persons on a form prescribed by the director. There is no acquisition of control if a new person is added to the ownership of a licensee's business but the controlling persons remain identical to the controlling persons that have been previously disclosed to the director as part of the licensee's existing ownership. All officers, directors or other controlling persons shall meet the qualifications for licensure as prescribed by this title. On request, the director shall conduct a preinvestigation before the assignment, sale or transfer of control of a license or licensee, the reasonable costs of which, not more than $1,000, shall be borne by the applicant. The preinvestigation shall determine whether the qualifications for licensure as prescribed by this title are met. On receipt of notice of an acquisition of control or request of a preinvestigation, the director, within fifteen days after receipt, shall forward the notice of the acquisition of control to the local governing body of the city or town, if the licensed premises is in an incorporated area, or the county, if the licensed premises is in an unincorporated area.  The director shall include in the notice to the local governing body written instructions on how the local governing body may examine, free of charge, the results of the department's investigation regarding the capabilities, qualifications and reliability of all officers, directors or other controlling persons listed in the application for acquisition of control. The local governing body, or the governing body's designee, may provide the director with a recommendation, either in favor of or against the acquisition of control, within sixty days after the director mails the notice, but section 4-201 does not apply to the acquisition of control provided for in this section.  A local governing body may charge not more than one fee, regardless of the number of licenses held by the applicant, for review of one or more applications for acquisition of control submitted to the department at the same time and for the same entity. Within one hundred five days after filing the notice of the acquisition of control, the director shall determine whether the applicant is qualified, capable and reliable for licensure. A recommendation by the local governing body, or the governing body's designee, against the acquisition of control or denial by the director shall be set for a hearing before the board. The person who has acquired control of a license or licensee has the burden of an original application at the hearing, and the board shall make its determination pursuant to section 4-202 and this section with respect to capability, reliability and qualification. G. A licensee who holds a license in nonuse status for more than five months shall be required to pay a $100 surcharge for each month thereafter. The surcharge shall be paid at the time the license is returned to active status.  A license automatically reverts to the state after being held in continuous nonuse for more than thirty-six months.  The director may waive the surcharge and may extend the time period provided in this subsection for good cause if the licensee files a written request for an extension of time to place the license in active status before the date of the automatic reversion. Unless the reverted license of the licensee has been subsequently reissued, the director shall relieve a licensee or its legal representative from a prior license reversion under this section if the request for such relief is filed in writing not later than two years after the date of reversion.  A license shall not be deemed to have gone into active status if the license is transferred to a location that at the time of or immediately before the transfer had an active license of the same type, unless the licenses are under common ownership or control. H. A restructuring of a licensee's business is not an acquisition of control, a transfer of a spirituous liquor license or the issuance of a new spirituous liquor license if both of the following apply: 1. All of the controlling persons of the licensee and the new business entity are identical. 2. There is no change in control or beneficial ownership. I. If subsection H of this section applies, the licensee's history of violations of this title is the history of the new business entity.  The director may prescribe a form and shall require the applicant to provide the necessary information to ensure compliance with this subsection and subsections F and G of this section. J. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, the holder of a retail license in this state having off-sale privileges, except a bar, beer and wine bar or restaurant licensee, may take orders by telephone, mail, fax or catalog, through the internet or by other means for the sale and delivery of spirituous liquor off of the licensed premises to a person in this state in connection with the sale of spirituous liquor. Notwithstanding the definition of "sell" prescribed in section 4-101, the placement of an order and payment pursuant to this section is not a sale until delivery has been made.  At the time that the order is placed, the licensee shall inform the purchaser that state law requires a purchaser of spirituous liquor to be at least twenty-one years of age and that the person accepting delivery of the spirituous liquor is required to comply with this state's age identification requirements as prescribed in section 4-241, subsections A and K. The licensee may maintain a delivery service and may contract with one or more independent contractors, that may also contract with one or more independent contractors, or may contract with a common carrier for delivery of spirituous liquor if the spirituous liquor is loaded for delivery at the premises of the retail licensee in this state and delivered in this state.  Except if the person delivering the order has personally retrieved and bagged or otherwise packaged the container of spirituous liquor for delivery and the licensee records, or requires to be recorded electronically, the identification information for each delivery, all containers of spirituous liquor delivered pursuant to this subsection shall be conspicuously labeled with the words "contains alcohol, signature of person who is twenty-one years of age or older is required for delivery". The licensee is responsible for any violation of this title or any rule adopted pursuant to this title that is committed in connection with any sale or delivery of spirituous liquor. Delivery must be made by an employee of the licensee or other authorized person as provided by this section who is at least twenty-one years of age to a customer who is at least twenty-one years of age and who displays an identification at the time of delivery that complies with section 4-241, subsection K. The retail licensee shall collect payment for the full price of the spirituous liquor from the purchaser before the product leaves the licensed premises. The director shall adopt rules that set operational limits for the delivery of spirituous liquors by the holder of a retail license having off-sale privileges. With respect to the delivery of spirituous liquor, for any violation of this title or any rule adopted pursuant to this title that is based on the act or omission of a licensee's employee or other authorized person, the mitigation provision of section 4-210, subsection G applies, with the exception of the training requirement. For the purposes of this subsection and notwithstanding the definition of "sell" prescribed in section 4-101, section 4-241, subsections A and K apply only at the time of delivery. For the purposes of compliance with this subsection, an independent contractor, a subcontractor of an independent contractor, the employee of an independent contractor or the employee of a subcontractor is deemed to be acting on behalf of the licensee when making a delivery of spirituous liquor for the licensee. K. Except as provided in subsection J of this section, Arizona licensees may transport spirituous liquors for themselves in vehicles owned, leased or rented by the licensee. L. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, an off-sale retail licensee may provide consumer tasting of wines off of the licensed premises subject to all applicable provisions of section 4-206.01. M. The director may adopt reasonable rules to protect the public interest and prevent abuse by licensees of the activities permitted such licensees by subsections J and L of this section. N. Failure to pay any surcharge prescribed by subsection G of this section or failure to report the period of nonuse of a license shall be grounds for revocation of the license or grounds for any other sanction provided by this title. The director may consider extenuating circumstances if control of the license is acquired by another party in determining whether or not to impose any sanctions under this subsection. O. If a licensed location has not been in use for three years, the location must requalify for a license pursuant to subsection A of this section and shall meet the same qualifications required for issuance of a new license except when the director deems that the nonuse of the location was due to circumstances beyond the licensee's control and an extension of time has been granted pursuant to subsection G of this section. P. If the licensee's interest is forfeited pursuant to section 4-210, subsection L, the location shall requalify for a license pursuant to subsection A of this section and shall meet the same qualifications required for issuance of a new license except when a bona fide lienholder demonstrates mitigation pursuant to section 4-210, subsection K. Q. The director may implement a procedure for the issuance of a license with a licensing period of two years. R. For any sale of a farm winery or craft distiller or change in ownership of a farm winery or craft distiller directly or indirectly, the business, stock-in-trade and spirituous liquor may be transferred with the ownership, in compliance with the applicable requirements of this title. S. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, bar, beer and wine bar, liquor store, beer and wine store or restaurant licensees in this state may take orders by telephone, mail, fax or catalog, through the internet or by other means for the sale and delivery of spirituous liquor off the licensed premises as follows: 1. Bar licensees for beer, wine, distilled spirits and mixed cocktails. 2. Beer and wine bar licensees for beer and wine. 3. Liquor store licensees for beer, wine, distilled spirits and mixed cocktails. 4. Beer and wine store licensees for beer and wine. 5. Restaurant licensees for any of the following: (a) Mixed cocktails, with the sale of menu food items for consumption on or off the licensed premises, if the restaurant holds a permit issued pursuant to section 4-203.07 and section 4-205.02, subsection K or a lease pursuant to section 4-203.06. (b) Beer if the restaurant holds a permit issued pursuant to section 4-205.02, subsection H. (c) Beer, wine and distilled spirits if the restaurant holds an off-sale privileges lease with a bar or liquor store pursuant to section 4-203.07. (d) Beer and wine if the restaurant holds an off-sale privileges lease with a beer and wine bar pursuant to section 4-203.07. T. Notwithstanding the definition of "sell" prescribed in section 4-101, placing an order and paying for that order pursuant to subsection S of this section is not a sale until delivery has been made. At the time that the order is placed, the licensee shall inform the purchaser that state law requires a purchaser of spirituous liquor to be at least twenty-one years of age and that the person accepting delivery of the spirituous liquor is required to comply with this state's age identification requirements as prescribed in section 4-241, subsections A and K.  The licensee may maintain a delivery service and may contract with one or more alcohol delivery contractors registered pursuant to section 4-205.13 for delivery of spirituous liquor if the spirituous liquor is packaged and tamperproof sealed by the bar, beer and wine bar, liquor store, beer and wine store or restaurant licensee or the licensee's employee and is loaded for delivery at the premises of the restaurant, beer and wine bar, liquor store, beer and wine store or bar licensee in this state and delivered in this state on the same business day. A liquor store or beer and wine store licensee may contract with one or more independent contractors as provided in subsection J of this section for delivery of spirituous liquor if the spirituous liquor is loaded for delivery at the premises of the liquor store or beer and wine store licensee in this state and delivered in this state on the same business day.  All containers of spirituous liquor delivered pursuant to subsection S of this section shall be tamperproof sealed and conspicuously labeled with the words "contains alcohol, signature of person who is twenty-one years of age or older is required for delivery". The licensee is responsible for any violation of this title or any rule adopted pursuant to this title that is committed in connection with any sale or delivery of spirituous liquor. Delivery must be made by an employee of the licensee or an employee or authorized independent contractor of a registered alcohol delivery contractor as provided by this section who is at least twenty-one years of age and delivery must be made to a customer who is at least twenty-one years of age and who displays an identification at the time of delivery that complies with section 4-241, subsection K. The restaurant, beer and wine bar, liquor store, beer and wine store or bar licensee shall collect payment for the full price of the spirituous liquor from the purchaser before the product leaves the licensed premises. The director shall adopt rules that set operational limits for the delivery of spirituous liquor pursuant to this subsection and subsection S of this section with respect to the delivery of spirituous liquor. For any violation of this title or any rule adopted pursuant to this title that is based on the act or omission of a licensee's employee or a registered alcohol delivery contractor, the mitigation provision of section 4-210, subsection G applies, with the exception of the training requirement. For the purposes of this subsection and notwithstanding the definition of "sell" prescribed in section 4-101, section 4-241, subsections A and K apply only at the time of delivery. An alcohol delivery contractor, a subcontractor of an alcohol delivery contractor, an employee of an alcohol delivery contractor or an employee of a subcontractor is deemed to be acting on behalf of the licensee when making a delivery of spirituous liquor for the licensee. For the purposes of this subsection, "business day" means between the hours of 6:00 a.m. of one day and 2:00 a.m. of the next day. U. A licensee that has off-sale privileges and that delivers spirituous liquor as prescribed in this section shall complete a written record of each delivery at the time of delivery.  The written record shall include all of the following: 1. The name of the licensee making the delivery. 2. The complete address of the licensee making the delivery. 3. The licensee's license number. 4. The date and time of the delivery. 5. The address where the delivery was made. 6. The type and brand of all spirituous liquor delivered. V. A licensee that has off-sale privileges and that delivers spirituous liquor as prescribed in this section shall obtain the following information from the individual who accepts delivery: 1. The individual's name. 2. The individual's date of birth. 3. The individual's signature. The licensee making the delivery may use an electronic signature system to comply with the requirements of this paragraph. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 4-203.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-203.01. Interim permit; fee; rules A. The director may issue an interim permit to the applicant for a license of the same series, or for the replacement of a hotel-motel license with a restaurant license, at the same premises, regardless of whether that license is transferrable or nontransferable and regardless of whether that license has been used in the past three years, if any of the following conditions exists: 1. The director has good cause to believe the licensee is no longer in possession of the licensed premises. 2. The license for such premises was surrendered or expired or was terminated, canceled or in nonuse at that premises pursuant to rules of the department. 3. The applicant for the interim permit filed with the department an application for the issuance of a license of the same series of nontransferable license or the transfer or replacement of a transferable license of the same series, or for the replacement of a hotel-motel license with a restaurant license, at the same premises. B. The application for the interim permit shall be accompanied by an interim permit fee of one hundred dollars $100. C. An interim permit issued by the director pursuant to this section shall be for a period of not more than one hundred five days and shall not be extended except as provided in subsection D of this section. An interim permit is a conditional permit and authorizes the holder to sell such alcoholic beverages as would be permitted to be sold under the privileges of the license for which application has been filed with the department. D. Notwithstanding subsection C of this section, if the director extends the time limit for action by the department in connection with a license issuance or transfer pursuant to section 4-201.01, subsection B, the director shall issue an additional interim permit for a period equal to such extension unless either: 1. No interim permit has previously been issued. 2. For good cause shown the director denies the additional interim permit. E. Notwithstanding any other law, an interim permit may be canceled or suspended summarily at any time, if the director determines that good cause for such cancellation or suspension exists. There shall be no appeal from such cancellation or suspension of an interim permit to the board. The board may cancel an interim permit on applications that have been disapproved by the board. The cancellation or suspension of an interim permit may be appealed directly to the superior court. F. Application for an interim permit shall be on such form as the director shall prescribe prescribes. If an application for an interim permit is withdrawn before issuance or is refused by the director, the fee that accompanies such application shall be refunded. G. If an application for transfer of a license, person to person, or nontransferable spirituous liquor license is denied or an interim permit is revoked, is suspended or expires, the licensee may request the return of the surrendered license that has been issued for such premises. H. The director may prescribe rules governing the issuance of interim permits under this section. I. The director may deny an interim permit in situations in which a current licensee holds a license described in section 4-209, subsection B, paragraph 12 and the current license is not in compliance with section 4-205.02. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 4-205.02, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-205.02. Restaurant license; issuance; regulatory provisions; expiration; off-sale leases and permits; fee; definitions A. The director may issue a restaurant license to any restaurant in this state that is regularly open for serving food to guests for compensation and that has suitable kitchen facilities connected with the restaurant for keeping, cooking and preparing foods required for ordinary meals. B. The director shall issue the license in the name of the restaurant on application for the license by the owner or lessee of the restaurant, if the applicant is otherwise qualified to hold a spirituous liquor license. The holder of such a license is subject to the penalties prescribed for any violation of the law relating to alcoholic beverages. C. The holder of a restaurant license may sell and serve spirituous liquors solely for consumption on the licensed premises. For the purpose of this subsection, "licensed premises" may include rooms, areas or locations in which the restaurant normally sells or serves spirituous liquors pursuant to regular operating procedures and practices and that are contiguous to the restaurant or a noncontiguous patio pursuant to section 4-101, paragraph 32 33. For the purposes of this subsection, a restaurant licensee must submit proof of tenancy or permission from the landowner or lessor for all property to be included in the licensed premises. D. In addition to other grounds prescribed in this title on which a license may be revoked, the director may require the holder of a restaurant license issued pursuant to this section to surrender the license in any case in which the licensee ceases to operate as a restaurant, as prescribed in subsection A of this section.  The surrender of a license pursuant to this subsection does not prevent the director from revoking the license for other grounds prescribed in this title or for making deliberate material misrepresentations to the department regarding the licensee's equipment, service or entertainment items or seating capacity in applying for the restaurant license. E. Neither the director nor the board may initially issue a restaurant license if either finds that there is sufficient evidence that the operation will not satisfy the criteria adopted by the director for issuing a restaurant license described in section 4-209, subsection B, paragraph 12.  The director shall issue a restaurant license only if the applicant has submitted a plan for the operation of the restaurant. The plan shall be completed on forms provided by the department and shall include listings of all restaurant equipment and service items, the restaurant seating capacity and other information requested by the department to substantiate that the restaurant will operate in compliance with this section. F. The holder of the license described in section 4-209, subsection B, paragraph 12 who intends to alter the seating capacity or dimensions of a restaurant facility shall notify the department in advance on forms provided by the department. G. The director may charge a fee for site inspections conducted before the issuance of a restaurant license. H. A restaurant applicant or licensee may apply for a permit allowing for the sale of beer for consumption off the licensed premises pursuant to section 4-244, paragraph 32, subdivision (c) on a form prescribed and furnished by the director. The department shall not issue a permit to a restaurant applicant or licensee that does not meet the requirements in section 4-207, subsection A. Section 4-207, subsection B does not apply to this subsection. The permit shall be issued only after the director has determined that the public convenience requires and that the best interest of the community will be substantially served by the issuance of the permit, considering the same criteria adopted by the director for issuing a restaurant license described in section 4-209, subsection B, paragraph 12. The amount of beer sold under the permit shall not exceed ten percent of gross revenue of spirituous liquor sold by the establishment.  After the permit has been issued, the permit shall be noted on the license itself and in the records of the department. The director may charge a fee for processing the application for the permit and a renewal fee. I. Notwithstanding any rule adopted by the department, business establishments that relied on a form issued by the department that provides for a small restaurant exemption for fifty or fewer seats before January 31, 2019 are allowed to continue to maintain the capacity of fifty or fewer seats for the duration of the business.  The rights of a business establishment subject to this section are not transferable. J. Notwithstanding section 4-203, subsection E, section 4-207 and section 4-210, subsection A, paragraph 6, through December 31, 2025, a restaurant applicant or licensee may apply to the department for a lease for the privilege of selling mixed cocktails for consumption off the licensed premises pursuant to section 4-203.06 and section 4-244, paragraph 32, subdivision (d). K. Notwithstanding section 4-207, beginning January 1, 2026, a restaurant applicant or licensee may apply for a permit to allow the sale of mixed cocktails for consumption off the licensed premises pursuant to section 4-203.07 and section 4-244, paragraph 32, subdivision (d), on a form prescribed and furnished by the director. The sale of mixed cocktails for consumption off the licensed premises must be accompanied by the sale of menu food items for consumption on or off the licensed premises.  The department shall issue the permit only after the director has determined that the public convenience requires and that the best interest of the community will be substantially served by issuing the permit. All permit holders and their employees, managers and agents must complete alcohol training pursuant to section 4-112, subsection G, paragraph 2. After the department issues the permit, the permit shall be noted on the license itself and in the records of the department. The director may establish and charge a fee for processing the permit application and a renewal fee. L. A restaurant licensee shall cease selling spirituous liquor, including mixed cocktails, for off-premises consumption when the licensee ceases regular kitchen service for food. M. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Gross revenue": (a) Means the revenue derived from all sales of food and spirituous liquor on the licensed premises, regardless of whether the sales of spirituous liquor are made under a restaurant license issued pursuant to this section or under any other license that has been issued for the premises pursuant to this article. (b) Includes revenue derived from spirituous liquor sold for off-sale consumption. 2. "Restaurant" means an establishment that derives at least forty percent of its gross revenue from the sale of food, including sales of food for consumption off the licensed premises if the amount of these sales included in the calculation of gross revenue from the sale of food does not exceed fifteen percent of all gross revenue of the restaurant. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 4-205.04, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-205.04. Farm winery license; issuance; regulatory provisions; retail site; fee A. The director may issue a farm winery license to any person who meets the requirements of subsection C of this section. Each location that engages in producing or manufacturing these products must obtain a separate farm winery license. The licensee may not transfer the farm winery license from person to person or from location to location. B. An applicant for a farm winery license, at the time of filing the application for the license, shall accompany the application with the license fee. A person who holds a farm winery license shall report annually at the end of each calendar year, at the time and in the manner as the director prescribes, the amount of wine produced or manufactured by the licensee during the calendar year. In addition to any provision of this title, if the total amount of wine produced or manufactured during the year exceeds the amount permitted annually by the license, the licensee shall apply for and receive a producer's license only on surrender of the farm winery license or licenses. C. A person may be licensed as a farm winery to sell wine produced or manufactured if in a calendar year it produces at least two hundred gallons and not more than forty thousand gallons of wine and if the winery either holds a winery permit issued by the United States alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau or has a contract pursuant to subsection D of this section for the production or manufacturing of wine from grapes or other fruit grown on at least five producing acres of land owned or controlled by the applicant and the land has been devoted to fruit growing for at least three consecutive calendar years. A licensed farm winery may make sales and deliveries of wine only as specifically provided in this section and as follows: 1. A licensed farm winery may make sales and deliveries of wine to wholesalers licensed to sell wine under this title. 2. A licensed farm winery may serve wine produced or manufactured on the premises for the purpose of sampling the wine. The wine may include wine produced pursuant to subsection D of this section and section 4-243.03. 3. A representative of the licensed farm winery may consume small amounts of the products of the licensed farm winery on the premises for the purpose of sampling the wine. The wine may include wine produced pursuant to subsection D of this section and section 4-243.03. 4. A licensed farm winery may sell to a consumer physically present on the premises wine produced or manufactured on the premises in the original container for consumption on or off the premises. The wine may include wine produced pursuant to subsection D of this section and section 4-243.03. 5. A licensed farm winery may purchase and sell wine produced, packaged and labeled by another licensed farm winery for sampling and consumption on or off the premises only if the retail sale is to a consumer physically present on the premises of the farm winery, except that the sales of wine produced, packaged and labeled by another winery may not exceed twenty percent of the farm winery's sales by volume. The percentage limitation shall not apply to wine produced pursuant to subsection D of this section and section 4-243.03. 6. If the licensed farm winery is not otherwise engaged in the business of a distiller, vintner, brewer, rectifier, blender or other producer of spirituous liquor in any jurisdiction, the licensed farm winery may hold licenses prescribed in section 4-209, subsection B, paragraph 12 on the licensed farm winery premises or other retail premises. Except as provided in paragraph 5 of this subsection, the licensed farm winery shall purchase all other spirituous liquor for sale at the on-sale retail premises from wholesalers that are licensed in this state, except that a licensed farm winery may: (a) Purchase wine from other farm wineries pursuant to paragraph 7 of this subsection. (b) Make deliveries of the wine that the farm winery produces to the farm winery's own commonly controlled retail licensed premises. 7. A licensed farm winery that produces not more than twenty thousand gallons of wine in a calendar year may make sales and deliveries of the wine that the licensed farm winery produces to on-sale and off-sale retailers. 8. Notwithstanding section 4-244, paragraphs 3 and 7, an on-sale or off-sale retailer may purchase and accept delivery of wine from a licensed farm winery pursuant to paragraph 7 of this subsection. 9. A licensed farm winery that produces not more than twenty thousand gallons of wine in a calendar year may make sales and deliveries of wine that the licensed farm winery produces to consumers off of the licensed premises and that is ordered by telephone, mail, fax or catalogue, through the internet or by other means if all of the following apply: (a) The purchaser of the wine provided the licensed farm winery with verification of the purchaser's legal age to purchase alcohol. (b) The shipping container in which the wine is shipped is marked to require the signature on delivery of an adult who is of legal age to purchase alcohol and delivery confirmation. (c) The wine is for personal use only and not for resale. (d) The wine is delivered by the licensed farm winery or shipped by the licensed farm winery by a common carrier to a residential or business address other than a premises licensed pursuant to this title. (e) The purchaser could have carried the wine lawfully into or within this state. (f) The delivery is made by a person who is at least twenty-one years of age. (g) The farm winery collects payment for the price of the spirituous liquor not later than at the time of delivery. 10. A licensed farm winery may make sales and deliveries as expressly permitted by sections 4-203.03, 4-203.04 and 4-244.04. D. A person otherwise qualified to receive a farm winery license may enter into a custom crush arrangement where a licensed winery produces or manufactures wine from grapes or other fruit supplied by the person. The winery receiving the fruit shall be licensed by the United States alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau and the department and is responsible for filing all reports that relate to its wine production or manufacturing with the United States alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau and the department. Each person supplying the grapes or other fruit shall first apply for and receive a farm winery license and shall report to the department all volumes of wine from its custom crush arrangements, which shall not be allocated to the gallonage of the receiving farm winery if the supplying farm winery has an active basic permit issued by the United States alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau. E. On application by a farm winery licensee, the director may authorize a farm winery licensee to operate up to two remote tasting and retail premises if: 1. The wine sold at the premises is limited to wine produced or manufactured by the licensed farm winery and wines produced or manufactured by other licensed farm wineries, including wines produced or manufactured pursuant to subsection D of this section and section 4-243.03. The farm winery may sell wine to a consumer physically present on the premises for consumption on or off the premises. Sales of wines not produced or manufactured by the farm winery are limited to not more than twenty percent of the total sales by volume at that location. The percentage limitation shall not apply to wine produced pursuant to subsection D of this section and section 4-243.03. 2. The farm winery licensee: (a) Remains responsible for the premises. (b) Obtains approval for the premises from the local governing body before submitting an application to the department. A copy of an order from the local governing body recommending approval of the premises must be filed with the department as part of the application. (c) Does not sublease the premises. (d) Has an agent who is a natural person who meets the qualifications of licensure in this state. (e) Meets the qualifications for a license pursuant to section 4-203, subsection A. F. A farm winery licensee may hold a craft distiller license issued pursuant to section 4-205.10. The farm winery and craft distiller licensee is subject to all other requirements of this section and section 4-205.10.  The farm winery may provide sampling and sales of the distilled spirits pursuant to section 4-205.10, subsection C, paragraphs 2 and 3 on the same premises as the wine sampling and retail sales. G. The farm winery is liable for any violation committed in connection with any sale or delivery of the wine.  The rules adopted by the director pursuant to section 4-203, subsection J apply to the delivery of wine under subsection C, paragraph 9 of this section. An act or omission of any person who makes a sale or delivery of wine for a licensee under subsection C, paragraph 9 of this section is deemed to be an act or omission of the licensee for the purposes of section 4-210, subsection A, paragraph 9. H. A farm winery that sells or delivers wine pursuant to this section shall: 1. Pay to the department of revenue all luxury taxes imposed pursuant to title 42, chapter 3 and all transaction privilege or use taxes imposed pursuant to title 42, chapter 5. 2. File all returns or reports required by law. I. A delivery of wine by a farm winery to a purchaser in this state is a transaction deemed to have occurred in this state. J. The director shall adopt rules in order to administer this section. K. The director may charge an additional farm winery license fee adopted pursuant to section 4-209 for issuing licenses, authorizations or approvals pursuant to subsections D and E of this section. L. The farm winery licensee that operates primarily as a remote tasting room premises may exchange the farm winery license for a remote tasting room license without an additional fee, not later than December 31, 2018. The new a remote tasting room license must be connected to a  the farm winery license, with common ownership, that complies and shall comply with all requirements for a farm winery license pursuant to subsections C and E of this section. M. Production and storage space of the farm winery is excluded from the licensed farm winery premises and is not the public area unless that space is also used for the sale of wine to the public or consumption of or sampling of wine by the public or to provide other services to the public. Pursuant to section 4-118, the director, the director's agents or any peace officer may inspect spaces excluded by this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, "public area" means a place within a farm winery that is accessible to the public and in which the farm winery authorizes the presence of members of the public. END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Section 4-205.08, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-205.08. Microbrewery license; issuance; regulatory provisions; retail site A. The director may issue a microbrewery license to any microbrewery. Each location that engages in producing, manufacturing and bottling these products must obtain a separate microbrewery license. The licensee may not transfer the microbrewery license from person to person or from location to location. B. An applicant for a microbrewery license, at the time of filing the application for the license, shall accompany the application with the license fee. Persons holding a microbrewery license shall report annually at the end of each calendar year, at the time and in the manner as the director prescribes, the amount of beer produced or manufactured by them during the calendar year and the amount delivered pursuant to subsection D, paragraph 4, subdivision (b) of this section.  If the total amount of beer that is produced or manufactured during the calendar year exceeds the amount permitted annually by the license, the licensee shall apply for and receive a producer's license only on surrender of the microbrewery license or licenses and shall have no continuing rights as a microbrewery under this section.  On the surrender of the microbrewery license or licenses, the licensee shall transfer, surrender or otherwise relinquish control of all of its retail licenses located remotely from a microbrewery. C. Notwithstanding any other law, a licensed microbrewery may: 1. Sell beer produced or manufactured on the premises for consumption on or off the premises. 2. Make sales and deliveries of beer that the microbrewery produces or manufactures to persons licensed to sell beer under this title through wholesalers licensed under this title or as provided in subsection D, paragraph 4, subdivision (a) or (b) of this section. 3. Make sales and deliveries of beer that the microbrewery produces or manufactures to persons licensed to sell beer in another state if lawful under the laws of that state. 4. Serve beer produced or manufactured on the premises for the purpose of sampling the beer. 5. Sell beer produced or manufactured by other microbreweries for consumption only on the premises of the licensee, except that the sales percentage of beer from other microbreweries may not exceed twenty percent of the licensee's annual sales of beer by volume at the premises. If the other microbrewery has established a distribution relationship with one or more wholesalers who are licensed under this title, the beer shall be purchased through those wholesalers. 6. Maintain at no charge a tapping equipment system of a licensed retailer when the microbrewery sells beer as provided in subsection D, paragraphs 3 and 4 of this section, including cleaning the tapping equipment system and replacing bonnet washers, friction rings, valve stems, hardware, unions, clamps, air tees, screws, tapping devices, tower heads and single air and beer lines. D. A licensed microbrewery is subject to all of the following requirements: 1. The microbrewery shall produce or manufacture not less than one thousand gallons of beer in each calendar year following the first year of operation. 2. The microbrewery shall not produce or manufacture more than six million two hundred thousand gallons of beer in a calendar year. 3. If retail operations are conducted in conjunction with the microbrewery, the microbrewery may sell other spirituous liquor products if the microbrewery holds an on-sale retail license for a bar, beer and wine bar or restaurant.  The microbrewery may be issued up to a combined total of seven retail licenses in this state, whether the premises are located on or adjacent to a microbrewery or remotely from a microbrewery. The limit on the number of retail licenses applies on an aggregated basis to all microbreweries that are under common control of any person with control of the microbrewery. 4. The microbrewery may make sales and deliveries of beer that it has produced or manufactured to both: (a) Retail licensees that meet the requirements prescribed in paragraph 3 of this subsection in any amount. (b) Any other retail licensee in a cumulative amount not to exceed ninety-three thousand gallons in total for all licensed retailers in any calendar year. E. A microbrewery that produces or manufactures more than one million two hundred forty thousand gallons of beer in a calendar year maintains all of the rights associated with a microbrewery license, except that the microbrewery shall not: 1. Apply for or receive a retail license pursuant to subsection D, paragraph 3 of this section for premises that are located remotely from the microbrewery. 2. Make sales or deliveries of beer that the microbrewery has produced or manufactured to any retail licensee as provided in subsection D, paragraph 4 of this section, except for the microbrewery's retail licensees on or adjacent to the microbrewery. F. The gallonage amounts prescribed in subsection D, paragraph 2 and subsection E of this section apply to the aggregate manufacture or production of all microbreweries that are under common control of any person with control of the microbrewery. G. A microbrewery that is otherwise engaged as a distiller, vintner, brewer, rectifier, blender or other producer of spirituous liquor in any jurisdiction is prohibited from holding any retail license that is located remotely from a microbrewery. This subsection does not prohibit a person with control of more than one microbrewery from conducting retail operations remotely from a microbrewery pursuant to subsection D, paragraph 3 of this section. H. A microbrewery that sells or delivers beer pursuant to this section shall: 1. Pay to the department of revenue all luxury taxes imposed pursuant to title 42, chapter 3 and all transaction privilege or use taxes imposed pursuant to title 42, chapter 5. 2. File all returns or reports required by law. I. A delivery of beer by a microbrewery to a purchaser in this state is a transaction deemed to have occurred in this state. J. The director shall adopt rules to administer this section. END_STATUTE Sec. 8. Section 4-205.10, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-205.10. Craft distiller license; issuance; regulatory provisions; fee A. The director may issue a craft distiller license to any person that meets the requirements of subsection C of this section. Each location that engages in producing and bottling these products must obtain a separate craft distiller license.  The licensee may not transfer the craft distiller license from person to person or from location to location and may not also hold a producer's license. The licensee and all commonly controlled craft distiller licensees may not manufacture or produce more than twenty thousand gallons of distilled spirits in a calendar year. For the purposes of this section, annual gallonage shall be the total proof gallons of finished distilled product available for wholesale or retail sale as defined by 26 United States Code section 5002 and rules adopted pursuant to this section or its successor. B. Persons holding a craft distiller license shall report annually at the end of each calendar year, at the time and in the manner as the director prescribes, the amount of distilled spirits that is produced or manufactured by that licensee during the calendar year. In addition to any other provision of this title, if the total amount of distilled spirits that is produced or manufactured during the year exceeds the amount that is permitted annually by the license, the licensee shall apply for and, on qualification, receive a producer's license only on the surrender of the craft distiller license and shall have no continuing rights as a craft distiller licensee under this section. C. A person may be licensed as a craft distiller to sell distilled spirits that are produced or manufactured by the person if in a calendar year the person produces or manufactures not more than twenty thousand gallons of distilled spirits and may make sales and deliveries of distilled spirits only as specified in this section and subject to the following criteria: 1. A licensed craft distiller may make sales and deliveries of distilled spirits to wholesalers that are licensed to sell distilled spirits under this title. 2. A licensed craft distiller may serve distilled spirits that are produced or manufactured on the premises for the purpose of consumption on the premises and may charge for samples on the premises of the craft distiller. 3. A licensed craft distiller may sell distilled spirits that are produced or manufactured on the premises in the original container for consumption off the premises to a consumer who is physically present on the premises. 4. The licensed craft distiller may hold one license prescribed in section 4-209, subsection B, paragraph 6 or 12 on or adjacent to the licensed craft distiller premises. The licensed craft distiller shall purchase all other spirituous liquor for sale at the on-sale retail premises from wholesalers that are licensed in this state, except that a licensed craft distiller may: (a) Purchase distilled spirits from other craft distillers that are licensed in this state.  Sales of craft distillery products not produced or manufactured by the craft distiller shall be limited to no not more than twenty percent of the total sales by volume. (b) Make deliveries of the distilled spirits that the craft distiller manufactures or produces to any commonly controlled retail licensed premises or to the craft distiller's remote tasting rooms and that are authorized pursuant to this paragraph. 5. A licensed craft distiller that produces not more than three thousand five hundred sixty-six gallons of distilled spirits in a calendar year may make sales and deliveries of distilled spirits that the licensed craft distiller produces to on-sale and off-sale retailers. 6. Notwithstanding section 4-244, paragraphs 3 and 7, an on-sale or off-sale retailer may purchase and accept delivery of distilled spirits from a licensed craft distiller pursuant to paragraph 5 of this subsection. 7. A licensed craft distiller may make sales and deliveries of distilled spirits that the licensed craft distiller manufactures or produces to consumers off of the licensed premises if the sale or delivery is ordered by telephone, mail, fax, catalogue, the internet or by other means if all of the following conditions exist: (a) The purchaser of the distilled spirits provided the licensed craft distiller with verification of the purchaser's legal age to purchase alcohol and a copy of same is maintained in the records of the craft distiller. (b) The shipping container in which the distilled spirits are shipped is marked to require the signature on delivery of an adult who is of legal age to purchase alcohol and delivery confirmation. (c) The distilled spirits are for personal use only and not for resale. (d) The distilled spirits are shipped to a residential or business address other than a premises licensed pursuant to this title. (e) The purchaser could have carried the distilled spirits lawfully into or within this state. (f) A person who is at least twenty-one years of age makes the delivery. (g) The craft distiller collects payment for the price of the spirituous liquor no not later than at the time of delivery. D. On application by a craft distiller licensee, the director may authorize a craft distiller licensee to operate two other remote tasting and retail premises if: 1. The distilled spirits sold at the premises are limited to distilled spirits produced or manufactured by the licensed craft distillery and distilled spirits produced or manufactured by another licensed craft distillery. The craft distillery may sell to a consumer physically present on the premises distilled spirits produced by the craft distillery or by other licensed craft distilleries in the original container for consumption on or off the premises. The sales of the distilled spirits produced or manufactured by other craft distilleries shall not exceed twenty percent of the craft distillery's total sales by volume. 2. The craft distiller licensee: (a) Remains responsible for the premises. (b) Obtains approval for the premises from the local governing body before submitting an application to the department. A copy of an order from the local governing body recommending approval of the premises must be filed with the department as part of the application. (c) Does not sublease the premises. (d) Has an agent who is a natural person who meets the qualifications of licensure in this state. (e) Meets the qualifications for a license pursuant to section 4-203, subsection A. (f) For a tasting room with a shared patio, meets the requirements prescribed in section 4-205.12. E. A craft distiller licensee may hold a farm winery license issued pursuant to section 4-205.04. The craft distiller licensee and farm winery licensee are subject to all other requirements of this section and section 4-205.04. The craft distiller may provide sampling and retail sales of distilled spirits pursuant to subsection C, paragraphs 2 and 3 of this section on the same premises as the wine sampling and retail sales. F. The craft distiller is liable for any violation that is committed in connection with any sale or delivery of the distilled spirits. The rules adopted by the director pursuant to section 4-203, subsection J apply to the delivery of distilled spirits under subsection C of this section. An act or omission of any person who makes a sale or delivery of distilled spirits for a licensee under subsection C of this section is deemed to be an act or omission of the licensee for the purposes of section 4-210, subsection A, paragraph 9. G. A craft distiller that sells or delivers distilled spirits pursuant to this section shall: 1. Pay to the department of revenue all luxury taxes that are imposed pursuant to title 42, chapter 3 and all transaction privilege or use taxes that are imposed pursuant to title 42, chapter 5. 2. File all returns or reports that are required by law. H. A delivery of distilled spirits by a craft distiller to a purchaser in this state is a transaction deemed to have occurred in this state. I. The production and storage space of the craft distiller are excluded from the public area of the licensed craft distiller premises. Pursuant to section 4-118, the director, the director's agents or any peace officer may inspect spaces excluded by this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection: 1. "Production and storage space" means a bonded area, tax-paid storage area and area that provides no services to the public. 2. "Public area" means a place within a licensed and bonded craft distiller that is accessible to the public and in which the craft distiller sells and samples tax-paid product and authorizes the presence of members of the public. J. The director may adopt rules in order to administer this section. K. The director may charge a fee adopted pursuant to section 4-209 for the issuance of a license pursuant to this section. L. The director may issue a craft distiller license to be located on the same parcel of land as a farm winery licensed pursuant to section 4-205.04. END_STATUTE Sec. 9. Section 4-209, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-209. Fees for license, application, issuance, renewal and transfer; late renewal penalty; seasonal operation; surcharges A. A fee shall accompany an application for an original license or transfer of a license, or in case of renewal, shall be paid in advance. Every license expires annually, except that a license may be renewed for a two-year period pursuant to subsection M of this section if no compliance penalties have been issued to that location during the year before the renewal. A licensee who fails to renew the license on or before the due date shall pay a penalty of $150, which the licensee shall pay with the renewal fee. A license renewal that is deposited, properly addressed and postage prepaid in an official depository of the United States mail on or before the due date shall be deemed filed and received by the department on the date shown by the postmark or other official mark of the United States postal service stamped on the envelope.  If the due date falls on a Saturday, Sunday or other legal holiday, the renewal shall be considered timely if it is received by the department on the next business day. The director may waive a late renewal penalty if good cause is shown by the licensee.  A licensee who fails to renew the license on or before the due date may not sell, purchase or otherwise deal in spirituous liquor until the license is renewed. A license that is not renewed within sixty days after the due date is deemed terminated. The director may renew the terminated license if good cause is shown by the licensee. Except an application fee for a permit pursuant to section 4-203.07 and section 4-205.02, subsection K and leases pursuant to sections 4-203.06 and section 4-203.07, an application fee for an original license or the transfer of a license shall be $100, which shall be retained by this state. B. Issuance fees for original licenses shall be: 1. For an in-state producer's license to manufacture or produce spirituous liquor in this state, $1,500. 2. Except as provided in paragraph 15 of this subsection, for an out-of-state producer's, exporter's, importer's or rectifier's license, $200. 3. For a microbrewery license, $300. 4. For a wholesaler's license to sell spirituous liquors, $1,500. 5. For a government license issued in the name of a state agency, state commission, state board, county, city, town, community college or state university or the national guard, $100. 6. For a bar license, which is an on-sale retailer's license to sell all spirituous liquors primarily by individual portions and in the original containers, $1,500. 7. For a beer and wine bar license, which is an on-sale retailer's license to sell beer and wine primarily by individual portions and in the original containers, $1,500. 8. For a conveyance license issued to an operating railroad company, to sell all spirituous liquors in individual portions or in the original containers on all passenger trains operated by the railroad company, or to an operating airline company, to sell or serve spirituous liquors solely in individual portions on all passenger planes operated by the airline company, or to a boat operating in the waters of this state, to sell all spirituous liquors in individual portions or in the original containers for consumption on the boat, $1,500. 9. For a liquor store license, which is an off-sale retailer's license to sell all spirituous liquors, $1,500. 10. For a beer and wine store license, which is an off-sale retailer's license to sell beer and wine, $1,500. 11. For a hotel-motel license issued as such, to sell and serve spirituous liquors solely for consumption on the licensed premises of the hotel or motel, $1,500. 12. For a restaurant license issued as such, to sell and serve spirituous liquors solely for consumption on the licensed premises of the restaurant, $1,500. For a permit issued under section 4-205.02, subsection H allowing for the sale of beer for the consumption off the licensed premises pursuant to section 4-244, paragraph 32, subdivision (c), the director may charge a fee. For an application for a permit pursuant to section 4-203.07 and section 4-205.02, subsection K, the director may charge a fee.  The director may establish and charge fees for lease applications pursuant to sections 4-203.06 and section 4-203.07. 13. For a farm winery license, $100. The director may charge a licensed farm winery a fee pursuant to section 4-205.04, subsection K. 14. For a club license issued in the name of a bona fide club qualified under this title to sell all spirituous liquors on-sale, $1,000. 15. For an out-of-state winery that sells not more than two hundred forty gallons of wine in this state in a calendar year, $25. 16. The department may charge a fee for a craft distiller license. 17. The department may charge a fee for registering an alcohol delivery contractor pursuant to section 4-205.13. C. The department may issue licenses with staggered renewal dates to distribute the renewal workload as uniformly as practicable throughout the twelve months of the calendar year.  If a license is issued less than six months before the scheduled renewal date of the license, as provided by the department's staggered license renewal system, one-half of the annual license fee shall be charged. D. The annual fees for licenses shall be: 1. For an in-state producer's license to manufacture or produce spirituous liquors in this state, $350. 2. Except as provided in paragraph 15 of this subsection, for an out-of-state producer's, exporter's, importer's or rectifier's license, $50. 3. For a microbrewery license, $300. 4. For a wholesaler's license, to sell spirituous liquors, $250. 5. For a government license issued to a county, city or town, community college or state university or the national guard, $100. 6. For a bar license, which is an on-sale retailer's license to sell all spirituous liquors primarily by individual portions and in the original containers, $150. 7. For a beer and wine bar license, which is an on-sale retailer's license to sell beer and wine primarily by individual portions and in the original containers, $75. 8. For a conveyance license issued to an operating railroad company, to sell all spirituous liquors in individual portions or in the original containers on all passenger trains operated by the railroad company, or to an operating airline company, to sell or serve spirituous liquors solely in individual portions on all passenger planes operated by the airline company, or to a boat operating in the waters of this state, to sell all spirituous liquor in individual portions or in the original containers for consumption on the boat, $225. 9. For a liquor store license, which is an off-sale retailer's license to sell all spirituous liquors, $50. 10. For a beer and wine store license, which is an off-sale retailer's license to sell beer and wine, $50. 11. For a hotel-motel license issued as such, to sell and serve spirituous liquors solely for consumption on the licensed premises of the hotel or motel, $500. 12. For a restaurant license issued as such, to sell and serve spirituous liquors solely for consumption on the licensed premises of the restaurant, $500, and for a restaurant license that is allowed to continue operating as a restaurant pursuant to section 4-213, subsection E, an additional amount established by the director. The department shall transfer this amount to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund. The director may establish an annual fee for a permit pursuant to section 4-203.07 and section 4-205.02, subsection K. The director may charge annual lease amounts pursuant to sections 4-203.06 and section 4-203.07. 13. For a farm winery license, $100. The director may charge a licensed farm winery an annual fee pursuant to section 4-205.04, subsection K. 14. For a club license issued in the name of a bona fide club qualified under this title to sell all spirituous liquors on-sale, $150. 15. For an out-of-state winery that sells not more than two hundred forty gallons of wine in this state in a calendar year, $25. 16. The director may charge a fee for the annual renewal of a craft distiller license. 17. The department may charge a fee for the annual registration renewal of a registered alcohol delivery contractor pursuant to section 4-205.13. E. Where the business of an on-sale retail licensee is seasonal, not extending over periods of more than six months in any calendar year, the licensee may designate the periods of operation and a license may be granted for those periods only, on payment of one-half of the fee prescribed in subsection D of this section. F. Transfer fees from person to person for licenses transferred pursuant to section 4-203, subsection C shall be $300. G. Transfer fees from location to location, as provided for in section 4-203, shall be $100. H. Assignment fees for a change of agent, as provided for in section 4-202, subsection A, an acquisition of control, as provided for in section 4-203, subsection F, or a restructuring, as provided for in section 4-203, subsection H, shall be $100, except that where a licensee holds multiple licenses and requests multiple, simultaneous changes, the change of agent, acquisition of control or restructuring fee for the first license shall be $100 and the fee for all remaining licenses shall be $50 each, except that the aggregate fees shall not exceed $1,000 for all change of agents, $1,000 for all acquisitions of control and $1,000 for all restructurings. I. No fee shall be charged by the department for an assignment of a liquor license in probate or an assignment pursuant to the provisions of a will or pursuant to a judicial decree in a domestic relations proceeding that assigns ownership of a business that includes a spirituous liquor license to one of the parties in the proceeding. In the case of nontransferable licenses, no fee shall be charged by the department for the issuance of a license for a licensed business pursuant to a transfer of the business in probate or pursuant to the provisions of a will or pursuant to a judicial decree in a domestic relations proceeding that assigns ownership of the business to one of the parties in the proceeding. J. The director shall assess a surcharge of $30 on all licenses prescribed in subsection D, paragraphs 6, 7 and 12 of this section.  Monies from the surcharge shall be used by the department exclusively for the costs of an auditor and support staff to review compliance by applicants and licensees with the requirements of section 4-205.02, subsection E. The department shall assess the surcharge as part of the annual license renewal fee. K. The director shall assess a surcharge of $35 on all licenses prescribed in this section. Monies from the surcharge shall be used by the department exclusively for the costs of an enforcement program to investigate licensees who have been the subject of multiple complaints to the department. The enforcement program shall respond to complaints against licensees by neighborhood associations, by neighborhood civic groups and from municipal and county governments. The department shall assess the surcharge as part of the annual license renewal fee. L. The director shall assess a surcharge of $20 on all licenses prescribed in subsection D, paragraphs 11 and 12 of this section and $35 on all other licenses prescribed in this section. Monies from the surcharge and from surcharges imposed pursuant to subsection K of this section shall be used by the department exclusively for the costs of a neighborhood association interaction and liquor enforcement management unit. The unit shall respond to complaints from neighborhood associations, neighborhood civic groups and local governing authorities regarding liquor violations. The director shall report the unit's activities and the use of monies from the surcharge or surcharges imposed pursuant to subsection K of this section to the board at each board meeting or as the board may direct. M. Licenses may be renewed every two years with payment of license fees that are twice the amount designated in subsection D of this section and other applicable fees.  Licensees renewing every two years must comply with annual reporting requirements. The director may adopt reasonable rules to allow licensees to renew every two years. N. The department shall use all monies received from application fees for permits issued pursuant to section 4-205.02, subsection K, leases pursuant to sections 4-203.06 and section 4-203.07 and registrations pursuant to section 4-205.13 for administrative costs associated with the permit, registration or lease and enforcement of this chapter. END_STATUTE Sec. 10. Section 4-212, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-212. Injunctions If the board or the director has reasonable grounds to believe that a person is violating section 4-244.05 or 4-250.01 or is manufacturing producing, selling or dealing in spirituous liquor without a valid license, permit or registration in violation of this title, the board or the director may apply to the superior court for a temporary restraining order and other injunctive relief prohibiting the specific acts complained of by the board or the director. END_STATUTE Sec. 11. Section 4-214, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-214. Arizona wines; labeling A. A person licensed as A farm winery licensed pursuant to section 4-205.04 or licensed as a producer licensed pursuant to section 4-203 may label a wine offered for sale that states that the wine is any of the following: 1. An Arizona wine or a wine from a particular county in this state, if at least seventy-five percent of the wine by volume is produced or manufactured from grapes or other fruit grown in this state and is fermented, processed, bottled and labeled in this state. 2. A wine from a particular federally recognized viticultural area, if at least eighty-five percent of the wine by volume is produced or manufactured from grapes or other fruit grown within a federally recognized viticultural area that is located in this state and is fermented, processed, bottled and labeled in this state. 3. A wine from a particular vineyard, orchard, farm or ranch, if at least ninety-five percent of the wine by volume is produced or manufactured from grapes or other fruit grown in this state and is fermented, processed, bottled and labeled in this state. 4. Estate bottled, if one hundred percent of the wine by volume is produced or manufactured from a winery in a particular federally recognized viticultural area in which all grapes or other fruit were grown, crushed, fermented, processed, aged and bottled in a continuous process, the wine at no time having left the premises of the bottling winery. B. A licensee that complies with subsection A of this section is not subject to criminal, civil or administrative action for a violation of section 4-244, paragraph 39. END_STATUTE Sec. 12. Section 4-221, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-221. Registration of stills; forfeiture; sale; proceeds A. Every person having in his the person's possession or custody or under his the person's control a still or distilling apparatus shall register it with the director under the rules the director may prescribe, and every still or distilling apparatus not so registered, together with all mash, wort or wash, for distillation or for the production of spirits or alcohol, and all finished products, together with all personal property in the possession or custody of, or under the control of any person, which that may be used in the manufacture production or transportation of spirituous liquors, and which that is found in the building or in any yard or enclosure connected with the building in which the unregistered still or distilling apparatus is located, shall be forfeited to the this state. B. The still, distilling apparatus, mash, wort, wash or finished products shall forthwith be destroyed by any peace officer, and all personal property forfeited to the state shall be sold at public auction to the highest bidder for cash on five days' notice. C. The notice shall be posted at the courthouse in the county in which the personal property was seized or at the office of the director and shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation that is published in this state which and that is nearest to the place where the personal property was seized. After paying the expenses of the publication and the expenses of sale from the proceeds of the sale, any balance shall be paid into the state general fund of the state. END_STATUTE Sec. 13. Section 4-222, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-222. Registration of retail agents; fees A. Every person who holds a bar, beer and wine bar, liquor store, beer and wine store, club, hotel-motel or restaurant license and who is authorized by other similarly licensed retailers to act as their retail agent shall register with the director. Such registration shall be in accordance with the rules adopted by the director pursuant to section 4-112 and shall also include a listing of the names and business addresses of those similarly licensed retailers who have authorized him the person to act as their retail agent. While possessing a certificate of registration, a retail agent shall be entitled to purchase and shall accept delivery of spirituous liquors for which he the retail agent is licensed for and on behalf of himself the retail agent and those similarly licensed retailers who have authorized him the retail agent to act as their retail agent with the delivery to be made at the retail agent's licensed premises or other location authorized by the department. On the termination of such authorization by any retailer, the retail agent shall promptly notify the director. Nothing in This section shall does not require a wholesaler to sell malt beverages to a registered retail agent for distribution to other retailers. B. A fee of five dollars $5 shall be collected for each registered retailer in this state, and a fee of fifty dollars $50 for each registered agent for a distillery, winery, brewery, importer or broker having its place of manufacture production or business outside of the this state. C. The director shall issue a certificate of registration to each person so registered as provided in this section, and may, for good cause shown, cancel any certificate of registration so issued. END_STATUTE Sec. 14. Section 4-223, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-223. Authority of cities and towns to tax transactions involving spirituous liquors; prohibitions A. In addition to the taxes provided for in this chapter, incorporated cities and towns shall have the power to may levy a tax on the privilege of engaging or continuing in the business of selling spirituous liquor at retail within their corporate limits and to may impose a permit tax or fee, but this section shall does not apply to wholesalers licensed under section 4-209. B. This section shall does not be construed to give to incorporated cities and towns power to prohibit the manufacture production, sale, distribution, and disposal of intoxicating liquors. END_STATUTE Sec. 15. Repeal Section 4-225, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 16. Section 4-226, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-226. Exemptions This title does not apply to the following: 1. Drugstores selling spirituous liquors only on prescription. 2. Any confectionery candy containing less than five percent by weight of alcohol. 3. Ethyl alcohol intended for use or used for the following purposes: (a) Scientific, chemical, mechanical, industrial and medicinal purposes. For the purposes of this paragraph subdivision, medicinal purposes do not include ethyl alcohol or spirituous liquor that contains marijuana or usable marijuana as defined in section 36-2801. (b) By those authorized to procure spirituous liquor or ethyl alcohol tax-free, as provided by the acts of Congress and regulations promulgated under the acts of Congress. (c) In the manufacture of denatured alcohol produced and used as provided by the acts of Congress and regulations promulgated under the acts of Congress. (d) In the manufacture of patented, patent, proprietary, medicinal, pharmaceutical, antiseptic, toilet, scientific, chemical, mechanical and industrial preparations or products, unfit and not used for beverage purposes. (e) In the manufacture of flavoring extracts and syrups unfit for beverage purposes. 4. The purchase, storage, distribution, service or consumption of wine in connection with the bona fide practice of a religious belief or as an integral part of a religious exercise by a church recognized by the United States internal revenue service under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code and in a manner not dangerous to public health or safety. This exemption does not apply to any alleged violation of section 4-244, paragraph 9, 34, 35 or 41. 5. Beer or wine produced for personal or family use that is not for sale.  The beer or wine may be removed from the premises where it was made and exhibited at organized affairs, exhibitions or competitions, such as homebrewers' or home winemakers' contests, tasting or judging. 6. The manufacture or sale of bitters products that have been classified and approved as a nonbeverage product or unfit for beverage purposes by the United States alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau. This paragraph is consistent with the classification guidelines as established and administered by the United States alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau. 7. nonbeverage products as defined in 27 code of federal regulations part 17 and that are qualified by the United States alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau as nonbeverage products. END_STATUTE Sec. 17. Section 4-244, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-244. Unlawful acts; definition It is unlawful: 1. For a person to buy for resale, sell or deal in spirituous liquors in this state without first having procured a license duly issued by the board, except that the director may issue a temporary permit of any series pursuant to section 4-205.05 to a trustee in bankruptcy to acquire and dispose of the spirituous liquor of a debtor. 2. For a person to sell or deal in alcohol for beverage purposes without first complying with this title. 3. For a distiller, vintner, brewer or wholesaler knowingly to sell, dispose of or give spirituous liquor to any person other than a licensee except in sampling wares as may be necessary in the ordinary course of business, except in donating spirituous liquor to a nonprofit organization that has obtained a special event license for the purpose of charitable fundraising activities or except in donating spirituous liquor with a cost to the distiller, brewer or wholesaler of up to $500 in a calendar year to an organization that is exempt from federal income taxes under section 501(c) (3), (4), (6) or (7) of the internal revenue code and not licensed under this title. 4. For a distiller, vintner or brewer to require a wholesaler to offer or grant a discount to a retailer, unless the discount has also been offered and granted to the wholesaler by the distiller, vintner or brewer. 5. For a distiller, vintner or brewer to use a vehicle for trucking or transporting spirituous liquors unless there is affixed to both sides of the vehicle a sign showing the name and address of the licensee and the type and number of the person's license in letters not less than three and one-half inches in height. 6. For a person to take or solicit orders for spirituous liquors unless the person is a salesman or solicitor of a licensed wholesaler, a salesman or solicitor of a distiller, brewer, vintner, importer or broker or a registered retail agent. 7. For any retail licensee to purchase spirituous liquors from any person other than a solicitor or salesman of a wholesaler licensed in this state. 8. For a retailer to acquire an interest in property owned, occupied or used by a wholesaler in the wholesaler's business, or in a license with respect to the premises of the wholesaler. 9. Except as provided in paragraphs 10 and 11 of this section, for a licensee or other person to sell, furnish, dispose of or give, or cause to be sold, furnished, disposed of or given, to a person under the legal drinking age or for a person under the legal drinking age to buy, receive, have in the person's possession or consume spirituous liquor. This paragraph does not prohibit the employment by an off-sale retailer of persons who are at least sixteen years of age to check out, if supervised by a person on the premises who is at least eighteen years of age, package or carry merchandise, including spirituous liquor, in unbroken packages, for the convenience of the customer of the employer, if the employer sells primarily merchandise other than spirituous liquor. 10. For a licensee to employ a person under eighteen years of age to manufacture, sell or dispose of spirituous liquors. This paragraph does not prohibit the employment by an off-sale retailer of persons who are at least sixteen years of age to check out, if supervised by a person on the premises who is at least eighteen years of age, package or carry merchandise, including spirituous liquor, in unbroken packages, for the convenience of the customer of the employer, if the employer sells primarily merchandise other than spirituous liquor. 11. For an on-sale retailer to employ a person under eighteen years of age in any capacity connected with the handling of spirituous liquors. This paragraph does not prohibit the employment by an on-sale retailer of a person under eighteen years of age who cleans up the tables on the premises for reuse, removes dirty dishes, keeps a ready supply of needed items and helps clean up the premises. 12. For a licensee, when engaged in waiting on or serving customers, to consume spirituous liquor or for a licensee or on-duty employee to be on or about the licensed premises while in an intoxicated or disorderly condition. 13. For an employee of a retail licensee, during that employee's working hours or in connection with such employment, to give to or purchase for any other person, accept a gift of, purchase for the employee or consume spirituous liquor, except that: (a) An employee of a licensee, during that employee's working hours or in connection with the employment, while the employee is not engaged in waiting on or serving customers, may give spirituous liquor to or purchase spirituous liquor for any other person. (b) An employee of an on-sale retail licensee, during that employee's working hours or in connection with the employment, while the employee is not engaged in waiting on or serving customers, may taste samples of beer or wine of not more than four ounces per day or distilled spirits of not more than two ounces per day provided by an employee of a wholesaler or distributor who is present at the time of the sampling. (c) An employee of an on-sale retail licensee, under the supervision of a manager as part of the employee's training and education, while not engaged in waiting on or serving customers may taste samples of distilled spirits of not more than two ounces per educational session or beer or wine of not more than four ounces per educational session, and provided that a licensee does not have more than two educational sessions in any thirty-day period. (d) An unpaid volunteer who is a bona fide member of a club and who is not engaged in waiting on or serving spirituous liquor to customers may purchase for himself and consume spirituous liquor while participating in a scheduled event at the club. An unpaid participant in a food competition may purchase for himself and consume spirituous liquor while participating in the food competition. (e) An unpaid volunteer of a special event licensee under section 4-203.02 may purchase and consume spirituous liquor while not engaged in waiting on or serving spirituous liquor to customers at the special event. This subdivision does not apply to an unpaid volunteer whose responsibilities include verification of a person's legal drinking age, security or the operation of any vehicle or heavy machinery. (f) A representative of a producer or wholesaler participating at a special event under section 4-203.02 may consume small amounts of the products of the producer or wholesaler on the premises of the special event for the purpose of quality control. 14. For a licensee or other person to serve, sell or furnish spirituous liquor to a disorderly or obviously intoxicated person, or for a licensee or employee of the licensee to allow a disorderly or obviously intoxicated person to come into or remain on or about the premises, except that a licensee or an employee of the licensee may allow an obviously intoxicated person to remain on the premises for not more than thirty minutes after the state of obvious intoxication is known or should be known to the licensee for a nonintoxicated person to transport the obviously intoxicated person from the premises. For the purposes of this section, "obviously intoxicated" means inebriated to the extent that a person's physical faculties are substantially impaired and the impairment is shown by significantly uncoordinated physical action or significant physical dysfunction that would have been obvious to a reasonable person. 15. For an on-sale or off-sale retailer or an employee of such retailer or an alcohol delivery contractor to sell, dispose of, deliver or give spirituous liquor to a person between the hours of 2:00 a.m. and 6:00 a.m., except that: (a) A retailer with off-sale privileges may receive and process orders, accept payment or package, load or otherwise prepare spirituous liquor for delivery at any time, if the actual deliveries to customers are made between the hours of 6:00 a.m. and 2:00 a.m., at which time section 4-241, subsections A and K apply. (b) The governor, in consultation with the governor's office of highway safety and the public safety community in this state, may issue an executive order that extends the closing time until 3:00 a.m. for spirituous liquor sales in connection with a professional or collegiate national sporting championship event held in this state. 16. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow any person on or about the licensed premises to give or furnish any spirituous liquor to any person under twenty-one years of age or knowingly allow any person under twenty-one years of age to have in the person's possession spirituous liquor on the licensed premises. 17. For an on-sale retailer or an employee of such retailer to allow a person to consume or possess spirituous liquors on the premises between the hours of 2:30 a.m. and 6:00 a.m., except that if the governor extends the closing time for a day for spirituous liquor sales pursuant to paragraph 15 of this section it is unlawful for an on-sale retailer or an employee of such retailer on that day to allow a person to consume or possess spirituous liquor on the premises between the hours of 3:30 a.m. and 6:00 a.m. 18. For an on-sale retailer to allow an employee or for an employee to solicit or encourage others, directly or indirectly, to buy the employee drinks or anything of value in the licensed premises during the employee's working hours. An on-sale retailer shall not serve employees or allow a patron of the establishment to give spirituous liquor to, purchase liquor for or drink liquor with any employee during the employee's working hours. 19. For an off-sale retailer or employee to sell spirituous liquor except in the original unbroken container, to allow spirituous liquor to be consumed on the premises or to knowingly allow spirituous liquor to be consumed on adjacent property under the licensee's exclusive control. 20. For a person to consume spirituous liquor in a public place, thoroughfare or gathering. The license of a licensee allowing a violation of this paragraph on the premises shall be subject to revocation. This paragraph does not apply to the sale of spirituous liquors on the premises of and by an on-sale retailer. This paragraph also does not apply to a person consuming beer or wine from a broken package in a public recreation area or on private property with permission of the owner or lessor or on the walkways surrounding such private property or to a person consuming beer or wine from a broken package in a public recreation area as part of a special event or festival that is conducted under a license secured pursuant to section 4-203.02 or 4-203.03. 21. For a person to possess or to transport spirituous liquor that is manufactured produced in a distillery, winery, brewery or rectifying plant contrary to the laws of the United States and this state. Any property used in transporting such spirituous liquor shall be forfeited to the state and shall be seized and disposed of as provided in section 4-221. 22. For an on-sale retailer or employee to allow a person under the legal drinking age to remain in an area on the licensed premises during those hours in which its primary use is the sale, dispensing or consumption of alcoholic beverages after the licensee, or the licensee's employees, know or should have known that the person is under the legal drinking age. An on-sale retailer may designate an area of the licensed premises as an area in which spirituous liquor will not be sold or consumed for the purpose of allowing underage persons on the premises if the designated area is separated by a physical barrier and at no time will underage persons have access to the area in which spirituous liquor is sold or consumed. A licensee or an employee of a licensee may require a person who intends to enter a licensed premises or a portion of a licensed premises where persons under the legal drinking age are prohibited under this section to exhibit an instrument of identification that is acceptable under section 4-241 as a condition of entry or may use a biometric identity verification device to determine the person's age as a condition of entry. The director, or a municipality, may adopt rules to regulate the presence of underage persons on licensed premises provided the rules adopted by a municipality are more stringent than those adopted by the director. The rules adopted by the municipality shall be adopted by local ordinance and shall not interfere with the licensee's ability to comply with this paragraph. This paragraph does not apply: (a) If the person under the legal drinking age is accompanied by a spouse, parent, grandparent or legal guardian of legal drinking age or is an on-duty employee of the licensee. (b) If the owner, lessee or occupant of the premises is a club as defined in section 4-101, paragraph 8 9, subdivision (a) and the person under the legal drinking age is any of the following: (i) An active duty military service member. (ii) A veteran. (iii) A member of the United States army national guard or the United States air national guard. (iv) A member of the United States military reserve forces. (c) To the area of the premises used primarily for serving food during the hours when food is served. 23. For an on-sale retailer or employee to conduct drinking contests, to sell or deliver to a person an unlimited number of spirituous liquor beverages during any set period of time for a fixed price, to deliver more than fifty ounces of beer, one liter of wine or four ounces of distilled spirits in any spirituous liquor drink to one person at one time for that person's consumption or to advertise any practice prohibited by this paragraph. This paragraph does not prohibit an on-sale retailer or employee from selling and delivering an opened, original container of distilled spirits if: (a) Service or pouring of the spirituous liquor is provided by an employee of the on-sale retailer. A licensee shall not be charged for a violation of this paragraph if a customer, without the knowledge of the retailer, removes or tampers with a locking device on a bottle delivered to the customer for bottle service and the customer pours the customer's own drink from the bottle, if when the licensee becomes aware of the removal or tampering of the locking device the licensee immediately installs a functioning locking device on the bottle or removes the bottle and lock from bottle service. (b) The employee of the on-sale retailer monitors consumption to ensure compliance with this paragraph. Locking devices may be used, but are not required. 24. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow the unlawful possession, use, sale or offer for sale of narcotics, dangerous drugs or marijuana on the premises. For the purposes of this paragraph, "dangerous drug" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-3401. 25. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow prostitution or the solicitation of prostitution on the premises. 26. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow unlawful gambling on the premises. 27. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow trafficking or attempted trafficking in stolen property on the premises. 28. For a licensee or employee to fail or refuse to make the premises or records available for inspection and examination as provided in this title or to comply with a lawful subpoena issued under this title. 29. For any person other than a peace officer while on duty or off duty or a member of a sheriff's volunteer posse while on duty who has received firearms training that is approved by the Arizona peace officer standards and training board, a retired peace officer as defined in section 38-1113 or an honorably retired law enforcement officer who has been issued a certificate of firearms proficiency pursuant to section 13-3112, subsection T, the licensee or an employee of the licensee acting with the permission of the licensee to be in possession of a firearm while on the licensed premises of an on-sale retailer. This paragraph does not include a situation in which a person is on licensed premises for a limited time in order to seek emergency aid and such person does not buy, receive, consume or possess spirituous liquor. This paragraph does not apply to: (a) Hotel or motel guest room accommodations. (b) Exhibiting or displaying a firearm in conjunction with a meeting, show, class or similar event. (c) A person with a permit issued pursuant to section 13-3112 who carries a concealed handgun on the licensed premises of any on-sale retailer that has not posted a notice pursuant to section 4-229. 30. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow a person in possession of a firearm other than a peace officer while on duty or off duty or a member of a sheriff's volunteer posse while on duty who has received firearms training that is approved by the Arizona peace officer standards and training board, a retired peace officer as defined in section 38-1113 or an honorably retired law enforcement officer who has been issued a certificate of firearms proficiency pursuant to section 13-3112, subsection T, the licensee or an employee of the licensee acting with the permission of the licensee to remain on the licensed premises or to serve, sell or furnish spirituous liquor to a person in possession of a firearm while on the licensed premises of an on-sale retailer. It is a defense to action under this paragraph if the licensee or employee requested assistance of a peace officer to remove such person. This paragraph does not apply to: (a) Hotel or motel guest room accommodations. (b) Exhibiting or displaying a firearm in conjunction with a meeting, show, class or similar event. (c) A person with a permit issued pursuant to section 13-3112 who carries a concealed handgun on the licensed premises of any on-sale retailer that has not posted a notice pursuant to section 4-229. 31. For any person in possession of a firearm while on the licensed premises of an on-sale retailer to consume spirituous liquor. This paragraph does not prohibit the consumption of small amounts of spirituous liquor by an undercover peace officer on assignment to investigate the licensed establishment. 32. For a licensee or employee to knowingly allow spirituous liquor to be removed from the licensed premises, except in the original unbroken package. This paragraph does not apply to any of the following: (a) A person who removes a bottle of wine that has been partially consumed in conjunction with a purchased meal from licensed premises if a cork is inserted flush with the top of the bottle or the bottle is otherwise securely closed. (b) A person who is in licensed premises that have noncontiguous portions that are separated by a public or private walkway or driveway and who takes spirituous liquor from one portion of the licensed premises across the public or private walkway or driveway directly to the other portion of the licensed premises. (c) A licensee of a bar, beer and wine bar, liquor store, beer and wine store, microbrewery or restaurant that has a permit pursuant to section 4-205.02, subsection H that dispenses beer only in a clean container composed of a material approved by a national sanitation organization with a maximum capacity that does not exceed one gallon and not for consumption on the premises if: (i) The licensee or the licensee's employee fills the container at the tap at the time of sale. (ii) The container is sealed and displays a government warning label. (d) A bar or liquor store licensee that prepares a mixed cocktail or a restaurant licensee that leases the privilege to sell mixed cocktails for consumption off the licensed premises pursuant to section 4-203.06 or holds a permit pursuant to section 4-203.07 and section 4-205.02, subsection K and that prepares a mixed cocktail and transfers it to a clean container composed of a material approved by a national sanitation organization with a maximum capacity that does not exceed thirty-two ounces and not for consumption on the premises if all of the following apply: (i) The licensee or licensee's employee fills the container with the mixed cocktail on the licensed premises of the bar, liquor store or restaurant. (ii) The container is tamperproof sealed by the licensee or the licensee's employee and displays a government warning label. (iii) The container clearly displays the bar's, liquor store's or restaurant's logo or name. (iv) For a restaurant licensee licensed pursuant to section 4-205.02, the sale of mixed cocktails for consumption off the licensed premises is accompanied by the sale of menu food items for consumption on or off the licensed premises. 33. For a person who is obviously intoxicated to buy or attempt to buy spirituous liquor from a licensee or employee of a licensee or to consume spirituous liquor on licensed premises. 34. For a person who is under twenty-one years of age to drive or be in physical control of a motor vehicle while there is any spirituous liquor in the person's body. 35. For a person who is under twenty-one years of age to operate or be in physical control of a motorized watercraft that is underway while there is any spirituous liquor in the person's body. For the purposes of this paragraph, "underway" has the same meaning prescribed in section 5-301. 36. For a licensee, manager, employee or controlling person to purposely induce a voter, by means of alcohol, to vote or abstain from voting for or against a particular candidate or issue on an election day. 37. For a licensee to fail to report an occurrence of an act of violence to either the department or a law enforcement agency. 38. For a licensee to use a vending machine for the purpose of dispensing spirituous liquor. 39. For a licensee to offer for sale a wine carrying a label including a reference to Arizona or any Arizona city, town or geographic location unless at least seventy-five percent by volume of the grapes used in making the wine were grown in Arizona. 40. For a retailer to knowingly allow a customer to bring spirituous liquor onto the licensed premises, except that an on-sale retailer may allow a wine and food club to bring wine onto the premises for consumption by the club's members and guests of the club's members in conjunction with meals purchased at a meeting of the club that is conducted on the premises and that at least seven members attend. An on-sale retailer that allows wine and food clubs to bring wine onto its premises under this paragraph shall comply with all applicable provisions of this title and any rules adopted pursuant to this title to the same extent as if the on-sale retailer had sold the wine to the members of the club and their guests. For the purposes of this paragraph, "wine and food club" means an association that has more than twenty bona fide members paying at least $6 per year in dues and that has been in existence for at least one year. 41. For a person who is under twenty-one years of age to have in the person's body any spirituous liquor. In a prosecution for a violation of this paragraph: (a) Pursuant to section 4-249, it is a defense that the spirituous liquor was consumed in connection with the bona fide practice of a religious belief or as an integral part of a religious exercise and in a manner not dangerous to public health or safety. (b) Pursuant to section 4-226, it is a defense that the spirituous liquor was consumed for a bona fide medicinal purpose and in a manner not dangerous to public health or safety. 42. For an employee of a licensee to accept any gratuity, compensation, remuneration or consideration of any kind to either: (a) Allow a person who is under twenty-one years of age to enter any portion of the premises where that person is prohibited from entering pursuant to paragraph 22 of this section. (b) Sell, furnish, dispose of or give spirituous liquor to a person who is under twenty-one years of age. 43. For a person to purchase, offer for sale or use any device, machine or process that mixes spirituous liquor with pure oxygen or another gas to produce a vaporized product for the purpose of consumption by inhalation or to allow patrons to use any item for the consumption of vaporized spirituous liquor. 44. For a retail licensee or an employee of a retail licensee to sell spirituous liquor to a person if the retail licensee or employee knows the person intends to resell the spirituous liquor. 45. Except as authorized by paragraph 32, subdivision (c) of this section, for a person to reuse a bottle or other container authorized for use by the laws of the United States or any agency of the United States for the packaging of distilled spirits or for a person to increase the original contents or a portion of the original contents remaining in a liquor bottle or other authorized container by adding any substance. 46. For a direct shipment licensee, a farm winery licensee or an employee of those licensees to sell, dispose of, deliver or give spirituous liquor to an individual purchaser between the hours of 2:00 a.m. and 6:00 a.m., except that a direct shipment licensee or a farm winery licensee may receive and process orders, accept payment, package, load or otherwise prepare wine for delivery at any time without complying with section 4-241, subsections A and K, if the actual deliveries to individual purchasers are made between the hours of 6:00 a.m. and 2:00 a.m. and in accordance with section 4-203.04 for direct shipment licensees and section 4-205.04 for farm winery licensees. 47. For a supplier to coerce or attempt to coerce a wholesaler to accept delivery of beer or any other commodity that has not been ordered by the wholesaler or for which the order was canceled. A supplier may impose reasonable inventory requirements on a wholesaler if the requirements are made in good faith and are generally applied to other similarly situated wholesalers that have an agreement with the supplier. END_STATUTE Sec. 18. Section 42-3001, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-3001. Definitions In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Affix" and "affixed" include imprinting tax meter stamps on packages and individual containers as authorized by the department. 2. "Beer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 4-101. 2. 3. "Brand family" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-7111. 3. 4. "Cavendish" means a tobacco product that is smoked from a pipe and that meets one of the following criteria: (a) Is described as cavendish, as containing cavendish or as a cavendish blend on its packaging, labeling or promotional materials. (b) Appears to have been processed or manufactured with an amount of flavorings and humectants that exceeds twenty percent of the weight of the tobacco contained in the product. (c) Appears to be blended with or contain a tobacco product described in subdivision (b) of this paragraph. 4. 5. "Cider" means vinous liquor that is made from the normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples, pears or other pome fruit, including flavored, sparkling and carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple, pear or other pome fruit must, and that contains more than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume but not more than seven percent of alcohol by volume. has the same meaning prescribed in section 4-101. 5. 6. "Cigar" means any roll of tobacco wrapped in leaf tobacco or in any substance containing tobacco other than any roll of tobacco that is a cigarette, as defined in paragraph 6  7, subdivision (b) of this section. 6. 7. "Cigarette" means either of the following: (a) Any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or any substance not containing tobacco. (b) Any roll of tobacco wrapped in any substance containing tobacco that, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to or purchased by a consumer as a cigarette described in subdivision (a) of this paragraph. This subdivision shall be interpreted consistently with the classification guidelines established by the federal alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau. 7. 8. "Consumer" means a person in this state that comes into possession of any luxury subject to the tax imposed by this chapter and that, on coming into possession of the luxury, is not a distributor intending to sell or distribute the luxury, a retailer or a wholesaler. 8. 9. "Craft distiller" means a distiller in the United States or in a territory or possession of the United States that holds a license pursuant to section 4-205.10. has the same meaning prescribed in section 4-101. 9. 10. "Distributor" means any person that manufactures, produces, ships, transports or imports into this state or in any manner acquires or possesses for the purpose of making the first sale of the following: (a) Cigarettes without Arizona tax stamps affixed as required by this article. (b) Roll-your-own tobacco or other tobacco products on which the taxes have not been paid as required by this chapter. 10. 11. "Farm winery" has the same meaning prescribed in section 4-101. 11. 12. "First sale" means the initial sale or distribution in intrastate commerce or the initial use or consumption of cigarettes, roll-your-own tobacco or other tobacco products. 12. 13. "Luxury" means any article, object or device on which a tax is imposed under this chapter. 13. 14. "Malt liquor": means any liquid that contains more than one-half of one percent alcohol by volume and that is made by the process of fermentation and not distillation of hops or grains, but not including: (a) Liquids made by the process of distillation of such substances. (b) Medicines that are unsuitable for beverage purposes. (a) Means any beverage that is obtained by the alcoholic fermentation, infusion or decoction of barley malt, hops, rice, bran or other grain, glucose, sugar or molasses, or any combination of them, and may include, as adjuncts in fermentation, honey, fruit, fruit juice, fruit concentrate, herbs, spices and other food materials. (b) Includes beer that is aged in an empty wooden barrel previously used to contain wine or distilled spirits and as such is not considered a dilution or mixture of any other spirituous liquor. 14. 15. "Master settlement agreement" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-7101. 15. 16. "Microbrewery" has the same meaning prescribed in section 4-101. 16. 17. "Nonparticipating manufacturer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-7111. 17. 18. "Other tobacco products" means tobacco products other than cigarettes and roll-your-own tobacco. 18. 19. "Participating manufacturer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-7111. 19. 20. "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, corporation, municipal corporation, estate, trust, club, society or other group or combination acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular number. 20. 21. "Place of business": (a) Means a building, facility site or location where an order is received or where tobacco products are sold, distributed or transferred. Place of business (b) Does not include a vehicle. 21. 22. "Retailer" means any person that comes into possession of any luxury subject to the taxes imposed by this chapter for the purpose of selling it for consumption and not for resale. 22. 23. "Roll-your-own tobacco" means any tobacco that, because of its appearance, type, packaging or labeling, is suitable for use and likely to be offered to or purchased by consumers as tobacco for making cigarettes. This paragraph shall be interpreted consistently with the term as used in section 44-7101. This paragraph shall be interpreted consistently with the classification guidelines established by the federal alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau. 23. 24. "Smoking tobacco": (a) Means any tobacco that, because of its appearance, type, packaging, labeling or promotion, is suitable for use and likely to be offered to or purchased by consumers as tobacco for making cigarettes or otherwise consumed by burning. Smoking tobacco (b) Includes pipe tobacco and roll-your-own tobacco. 24. 25. "Spirituous liquor" means any liquid that contains more than one-half of one percent alcohol by volume, that is produced by distillation of any fermented substance and that is used or prepared for use as a beverage. Spirituous liquor does not include medicines that are unsuitable for beverage purposes. has the same meaning prescribed in section 4-101. 25. 26. "Tobacco product manufacturer" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-7101. 26. 27. "Tobacco products" means all luxuries included in section 42-3052, paragraphs 5 through 9. 27. 28. "Vehicle" means a device in, on or by which a person or property is or may be transported or drawn on the roads of this state regardless of the means by which it is propelled or whether it runs on a track. 28. 29. "Vinous liquor": means any liquid that contains more than one-half of one percent alcohol by volume and that is made by the process of fermentation of grapes, berries, fruits, vegetables or other substances. (a) means the product obtained by the fermentation of grapes, other agricultural products that CONTAIN natural or added sugar or cider or any such alcoholic beverage fortified with grape brandy and that contains not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume. (b) Does not include: (a) (i) Liquids in which hops or grains are used in the process of fermentation. (b) (ii) Liquids made by the process of distillation of hops or grains. (c) (iii) Medicines that are unsuitable for beverage purposes. (iv) cider as defined in section 4-101. 29. 30. "Wholesaler" means a person that sells any spirituous, vinous or malt liquor taxed under this chapter to retail dealers or for the purposes of resale only. END_STATUTE Sec. 19. Section 42-3352, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-3352. Reports of distillers and producers A. Every distiller or manufacturer producer of distilled spirits and vinous and malt liquors that sells any of those products to wholesalers within this state shall maintain in its records a copy of the invoice of the sale, showing in detail: 1. The kind of liquor or beverage sold. 2. The quantities of each. 3. The size of the container and the weight of the contents. 4. The alcoholic content if required by section 42-3052. 5. The name of the person, firm or corporation to whom sold. B. A distiller or manufacturer producer shall make the invoices required to be kept pursuant to subsection A of this section available to the department on request. END_STATUTE Sec. 20. Section 42-3355, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-3355. Return and payment by farm wineries, producers, direct shipment licensees, microbreweries and craft distillers A. A farm winery selling vinous liquor at retail or to a retail licensee pursuant to title 4, chapter 2 that is manufactured or produced on the premises, a producer of vinous liquor that sells at retail pursuant to section 4-243.02 or a direct shipment licensee that sells pursuant to section 4-203.04 shall pay the tax under this chapter on all such liquor sold at retail or to a retail licensee within this state and add the amount of the tax to the sales price. B. A microbrewery selling malt liquor at retail or to a retail licensee pursuant to title 4, chapter 2 that is manufactured or produced on the premises or a manufacturer producer of beer that sells at retail pursuant to section 4-243.02 shall pay the tax under this chapter on all malt liquor sold at retail or to a retail licensee within this state and add the amount of the tax to the sales price. C. A craft distiller selling spirituous liquor at retail or to a retail licensee pursuant to title 4, chapter 2 that is manufactured or produced on the premises or a distiller of spirituous liquor that sells at retail pursuant to section 4-243.02 shall pay the tax under this chapter on all spirituous liquor sold at retail or to a retail licensee within this state and add the amount of the tax to the sales price. D. The farm winery, manufacturer producer, microbrewery, craft distiller or direct shipment licensee shall pay the tax to the department annually on or before the twentieth day of the first month of the year succeeding the year in which the tax accrues. E. On or before that date, the farm winery, manufacturer producer, microbrewery, craft distiller or direct shipment licensee shall prepare a sworn return for the year in which the tax accrues in the form prescribed by the department, showing: 1. The amount of liquors or beer sold in this state during the year in which the tax accrues. 2. The amount of tax for the period covered by the return. 3. Any other information that the department deems necessary for the proper administration of this chapter. F. The farm winery, manufacturer producer, microbrewery, craft distiller or direct shipment licensee shall deliver the return, together with a remittance of the amount of the tax due, to the department. G. Any taxpayer that fails to pay the tax within ten days after the date on which the payment becomes due is subject to and shall pay a penalty determined under section 42-1125, plus interest at the rate determined pursuant to section 42-1123 from the time the tax was due and payable until paid. H. For reporting periods beginning from and after December 31, 2019, or when the department has established an electronic filing program, whichever is later, each taxpayer shall file electronically any report or return required under this chapter. The report or return is considered to be filed and received by the department on the date of the electronic postmark pursuant to section 42-1105.02. END_STATUTE Sec. 21. Effective date Sections 4-101, 4-201, 4-203, 4-205.02, 4-205.04, 4-205.08, 4-205.10, 4-209, 4-212, 4-214, 4-221, 4-222, 4-223, 4-226, 4-244, 42-3001, 42-3352 and 42-3355, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, are effective from and after December 31, 2026. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR MAY 29, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAY 29, 2026.